Lean Meats with less than 2g of sugar per serving. (4oz servings at each meal)
Handlers are paid by owners to handle their dogs at shows. The goal is to earn champion titles. A handler must have a strong grasp of breed standards, lots of experience working in dog shows and a willingness to travel frequently. To get started, consider working as a handler’s assistant first.
The Bialystoker building (228 East Broadway), which opened in 1931, is a relic in comparison to its immediate neighbors, a parking garage (which notably collapsed in 1999) and a banal 1960s medical building known for a chipping mural on its side and to HBO subscribers as 'the New Zealand consulate' on the TV series 'Flight of the Conchords'. (Full confession: I lived across the street for both the collapse and the filming, so I find the block particularly endearing.)
Dry white wine- 3 tbsp
"If you go to the big churches, you will see there are thousands of people, but they are so quiet and disciplined. We also want to be like that. And we want to show unity in the way we follow Zuma."
I don't even remember much about this movie. Which should tell you something. Something about badly drawn vampires and a silly Frankenstein monster on the loose and laughable, messy special effects. I think I own it because it's got Kate Beckinsale in a corset, and I guess that's enough for me.
14 Complete Works of Shakespeare (I've read a few)
“Who are you?” I demanded.
Another variety includes the folding dining study table. These tables are versatile and can be used for various purposes. It can be fixed to a location if required. It is also portable. Available in a wide variety of shapes and sizes, these tables are also used as dining tables.
Let your characters have their secrets. Hint at things that you never fully explain. Never reveal why they shudder at the mere mention of Nebraska, or why they take the crime they’re investigating so personally when the victim is a child.
To learn more about the book A Radical Idea by David Platt visit the Multnomah Publishing Website. http://waterbrookmultnomah.com/
You want to know the neatest thing about my team? The diversity. The majority of the team spoke Arabic as their first language. The rest of the team was made up of a girl was from Japan, a guy from Korea, a kid from Farmington, MO and then me. There were many moments at the moment where the field was filled with them yelling Arabic at each other, calling out different spots. I will say that one of the only times I understood them was when they were angry, because their outburst were marked with a very American phrase… Other than that, because of the diverse backgrounds, we didn’t really need to understand what we were saying.
I think about what happens at dawn, the space in between night and day, the waking of the world, the settling of the night. I think about what happens in those transitions from one time to another, from lightness to darkness and back again.
There is little for the off trade bargain hunter. If you know of any apps, let me know, otherwise I’m seeing a gap to help and assist the cooking lager enthusiasts of blighty. I don’t know how easy it is to develop an android app or whether my supermarket want third parties linking to their web services. I know this; sites like my supermarket find their data by linking to web services hosted by the supermarkets. It is all technically possible to let me know on my Android phone where the cheapest box of Carling is and where that supermarket is on Google maps. It’s an exciting world.
Just to put this in writing (and I have no legal counsel as to if it is OK or not, but fuck it), but I have two members in mind to join the team. The first is Chris Michel, resident beer drinker/brewer/smart guy/business-savvy money man, and the second is also a Chris. This Chris is a very accomplished brewer and a good all-around guy, and if he is interested, and does well in the interview process (i.e., delivers good quality brew), this could work out nicely. I'm interested to see what actually happens on this front in the long run, so future Dave: I hope you're happy with what you've done.
Are you a hireling or a Levite? My prayer for you this week is that the Lord will help you to cultivate the heart of a Levite in your workplace for His glory and honor.
I think I know who you are talking about. She made some mistakes in the sense that she responded on the wrong platform. So what she should have done is withdraw herself, temporarily and come back. One step backward to win two, three steps in the future.
Good luck, and may you find your lobster!
pieces of straw, hay or dead grass
As regards Syria, there is only one option and this is for Assad clan to go in exile in Russia and be brought to justice in absentia.
A voice jolted me back to reality, and for the first time in eight and a half years I was staring into the face of the only boy I have ever loved.
Demi's a tough cookie who wasn't born into a life of privilege like so many actresses--she's no Jane Fonda or Tori Spelling or Kate Hudson.
In a skillet over medium heat, begin cooking the potatoes, radishes, and carrot. Cook it for about 10-15 minutes stirring occasionally so that it cooks evenly. The potatoes will take the longest to really cook so be sure to judge how done it is from the potato pieces. The cook time with vary based on the size of different vegetable piece.
That she held there
These statistics are directly from NADA, the National Automobile Dealers Association…
Among all the participating at the Challenge, someone will be drawn with the random system to win this fabulousStamp by Heidi Swapp Heidi Swapp "Crown"
It was such a memorable and fun weekend. I will treasure the memories and pictures always. Each year we try to do a girls trip (usually a ski trip) and this year's weekend did NOT disappoint!
"I was glad to read your story To Dust Return. I am sorry that I cannot write to you about it with enthusiasm.... I'm afraid you have tried to substitute novelty for real dramatic narrative. This sometimes works but very seldom. I'm afraid that I must, therefore, tell you that you should look elsewhere for an agent.... Yours, Larabie Cunningham, McIntosh & Otis Inc., NY, NY"
05-12 Atlantic City, NJ – Borgata Spa & Resort Event Center *
Some more stuff involving the bad guys, Scarface gets introduced and is shown interrogating the man in a manner which further depicts the ‘bad’ guys in a multi-dimensional manner, with complex motives and a sense of morality.
A boolean value cannot be converted to any other data type, nor can any other data type be converted to a boolean value. The words true and false are reserved in Java as boolean literals and cannot be used outside of this context.
He is easily silence by the judgments of others; he listens with an immobile face as they venerate, admire, love, and transfigure where he has seen—or he even conceals his silence by expressly agreeing with some foreground opinion.[6]
The priest said, “You won fair and square
Over the past several years Blue Foundation has expanded their audience, embracing both the underground and the alternative mainstream. Along with the “Twilight” saga and “Miami Vice,” Blue Foundation's music has been featured on various TV series, including "The O.C.," "So You Think You Can Dance," "CSI:Miami," and "The Cleveland Show."
Survivor of hunters
that I first heard the names of Reinhold Niebuhr and Paul Tillich from President Carter. It was in the course of his 1976 Presidential campaign. I was 16 years old, and I had never heard those names before. I went to look them up. Now, at age 16 I did not find out a great deal about those two men, but as I studied theology as an academic discipline, I certainly did. It’s interesting of course that he would site those two theologians as most formative, in terms of his life and his thinking. Reinhold Niebuhr was a very complex figure, a titanic figure of Protestant theology of the twentieth century. A man who did indeed stress the reality of human sinfulness, but he did so primarily in terms of social structures. Not in terms of individual responsibility. There is a great question as to whether Reinhold Niebuhr actually believed in a personal God even though he did believe in a force of divine justice. Now when we come to Paul Tillich, there is an altogether different picture. We are rather certain that he did not believe in a personal God. In fact, he made very clear that he did not. He did not believe in a personal God, a revealing God, a God who speaks in scripture, but rather he believed in a great force, a ground of being. He merged existentialism with theological language. In other words, Paul Tillich was one of the most radical theologians of the twentieth century, and of course he gave birth to other radical schools of theology that followed. Now, the interesting thing to note here is that if you were a young man, a thinking young man, a thinking young protestant in the twentieth century during the decades when Jimmy Carter was coming to his intellectual maturity, if you were certain that vast social change needed to take place, you often looked to those leaders who were riveting the intellectual super structure for those changes. Unfortunately, on the theological side, it was often the liberal theologians who were right on some of the most important social issues. And altogether, too many young evangelicals attached their theological allegiance to liberal theologians who were right on other issues but deeply wrong on areas of theology. This lead to a trajectory where as there were a good many people who were raised in the piety of the Southern Baptist Convention and other denominations in the United States, but whose minds became very much attached to and even dependent upon theologians whose own theological systems were radically at odds with those who they had known as children. One of the things that we need to note is that theology matters. Isn’t it interesting that this theme that theology matters comes up in a conversation with the man whose chief claim to fame, notoriety and historical significance, is that he served not as a theologian and chief, but as Commander in Chief,
Today.
But it is ok! Never fear! For there are good snacky doodles out there! I will share them with you as I make and discover them for myself! But for today let me focus on my favourite new food find, and a snacky food find at that - www.grazebox.co.uk
This link will tell her story and give a view of her recent work.
O Death, where is thy sting? O Hell, where is thy victory?
I'm leaving' this place,
As I've mentioned before, the problem with the CSA box is that we often find ourselves with a refrigerator full of produce and no idea how to utilize it. We don't cook every day, as we should, and that makes the problem even worse. The first black zapotes we got rotted because they became ripe while we were out of the country. This time around we have about 7 zapotes sitting around, 3 of them REALLY needed to be used so I started researching ideas.
Mimosa
My co-worker brought in his baby today. Cute little boy. Only weighs 5 lbs 8 oz. His wife is barely 5 feet tall so she couldn’t have a baby much bigger. When our Brandon was born he weighed 10 lbs 12 oz. He was already raising his head in the newborn nursery. This little guy looks so small. I almost want one of my own….not!
on the fire-place trim ... wow does
I wonder if there could be a book length treatment of the pathetic. Books on the abject, sincerity, authenticity, the uncanny, and other elusive descriptors exist, but nothing I can find on the pathetic. You would think it would be fodder for a class warrior Marxist critic who could point to moments of sympathy, pity, and sadness that arise in person of privileged position due to the actions of someone in a low state or lower class, someone overly earnest, overly awkward, someone striving when they have no chance at nobility or proper recognition outside of their own fantasies. We on the outside, with knowledge of the societal frameworks that are producing the striving person’s embarrassing display, stand over the person and simply judge, “You’re pathetic.”
“So what’s he trying to prove?”
Their 2nd album, Bloody Kisses (with “Black No. 1“) is, to me, a seminal work in gothic rock/gothic metal/whatever you want to call it. I think it’s an insant-classic album that I will listen to until my dying day. “Black No. 1″ will remain in my party playlist forever.
Brian Greig was charged with Cultivation of Marijuana, Possession of Marijuana over 20 Grams and Possession of Drug Paraphernalia. His son Nicholas Thomas Greig, 22, was issued a Notice to Appear (NTA) for Possession of Marijuana under 20 Grams and Possession of Marijuana. Brian Greig posted a $6,000 bond this morning and was released.
To distinguish false from true;
Well, suffice to say it didn't live up to my expectations. After the movie ended, a woman sitting in front of me turned around and addressed the theater: "What did y'all think? I was not impressed." Still, I believe there is something to learn from every experience, so here are some writing take-aways I got from "Young Adult" that might be helpful to your own writing, too:
pinning up her hair.
The film stars Ophelia Lovibond, Neil Maskell, Ben Drew, Ricci Harnett and Jamie Belman – with Lee Sales on board as director – what was it like working with the cast and crew on-set?
It was beautiful there - I was close enough to the side of the road so I didn't have to worry about being smushed, and close enough that I could (sneakily) people-watch. It was a sunny afternoon, clear and crisp. (This would be an entirely different post had I spent the time waiting for Galahad wet and shivering.)
Yes, it can be a great way to multiply your sources of income. However, enrolling multiple programs and promoting them all in the same time will lose focus.
Note: ee cummings visited Paris for the first time in 1917, just before heading off to the Western Front with the Norton-Harjes ambulance corps. He lived in Paris for most of the period between 1921 and 1923 and made several return visits in the '20s and '30s.
My first stop was Tournai, this was the second city Henry besieged in 1513 (going as far as to personally aim and fire one of his apostles at the cathedral) and which also became English for five years as a result of their capitulation. Sadly I forgot to take my camera out with me on that day so you'll have to take my word for it. Well worth a visit for the Tudor enthusiast if only to add some context to your studies. The main aspect I took away with me is that it is almost 100 miles from Calais and, well, a rather rash decision I feel and one which I suspect was very much influenced by Maximilian. Records state the various Tournaisen complaints at being governed from Westminster along with those of the English garrison over delays in being paid (Cruickshank's books are good on this subject).
“A truffle nigiri was also quite exceptional. Imagine a small round ball of rice, wrapped gingerly with black truffle. Umami in the extreme.”–Ferdinand H.
To: XXXXX@cybersmart.co.za
image from ayushveda.com
Tom Hanks (Saving Private Ryan)
All evidence points to the fact that Cathy was abducted by some unknown assailant, but Jane has a hard time acknowledging that. She accepts the help of Paul, a mysterious man whom Cathy had been making goo-goo eyes at earlier in the day, before realizing that he may not be telling her the full truth about himself.
So put on your dancing pants and crank up the volume!!!
At its feet lay two swords crossed, heavy scimitars with wide cruel blades. Each was hewn from a plate of obsidian and knapped to a razors edge. Both were covered with a thick layer of dust, and whatever hilts, pommels, and sheathes once adorning them were gone with time, leaving the blades alone intact.
"Want to put the bumps on your body to bed? Use Soap & Glory Flake Away® a spa-strength dry skin body polish."
I had no problems with the actual pancake making though, I simply waited for the bubbles, squeezed the filling into a spiral and then flipped the pancake over. I did lift the corners to see if the pancake was golden then flipped onto a plate and did my best to drizzle with the glaze.
Situated on the island of Borneo, 1000km from Malaysia’s capital Kuala Lumpur, Sarawak’s political relationship with central government had been contentious since Malaysia’s formation in 1963. The desire of Sarawak’s nascent political establishment to assert its autonomy was continually trumped by the central government, who wished to maintain tight control over Sarawak’s substantial oil reserves and quell any latent separatism in this, largely non-Muslim region. After seven years of battling, there eventually emerged a new political elite of Muslim natives whom Kuala Lumpur trusted, and to whom it granted a wide degree of latitude. This elite’s domestic power rested on a simple formula: as gate-keeper of Sarawak’s land and another of its natural bounties, tropical timber.
this series of painting/drawings are a reflection on the disappearing of many plant/insect/animal species due to human activity. the loss of the unseen and unknown species that are part of our earths ecosystem and circle of life are of huge concern to scientists around the world, because if we dont know what we are losing, how can we make it right?
It is unmistakably Brautigan. And I’ll be honest a little Brautigan can go a long way; he is like Beckett in that respect. His style is laconic, repetitive and expressed in the simple, straightforward language that poor people living on Welfare in any one of a thousand small towns will use happily turning nouns into verbs whenever it suits their needs. The setting in this book is a succession of dreary towns in Oregon but you could shift the action to Louisiana or South Dakota and not bat an eye.
I sincerely hope that I haven't lost all of my blog friends!!
Fallon Jones is used to mystery, to tight situations that needs his investigation abilities and his other abilities that give some worry on how powerful he is.
So it goes to show, you never know where good pizza can take you.
This has to be the more crucial question, yet it’s the one so rarely asked when the studios are preparing to inject their old favourites with CGI Botox. In the case of the Star Wars facelift George Lucas altered the older films by using the latest technology at his disposal with the intention of making them look consistent with the new trilogy. But if Paramount followed this model and replaced the old effects with ones the same as the new movie, it would have surely have been going too far.
Blizzard’s antagonists are like Scooby Doo villains who are repeatedly thwarted only to return some time later with a wilder scheme for taking over the world. Metzen has even gone so far as to ask fans who they would like to see return from the dead, a move which is reminiscent of the comic book scene, where frequent ‘reboots’ enable writers to kill off key characters for dramatic effect (and increased sales!), only to have them returned later and explained away as occupants of an alternate multiverse.
I don’t really have anything else to say about it so i’ll talk about my life instead. Recently it’s been really hot. And for england, that means kinda warm. I’ve been toasting in my room, but i had my freind over, and we just played SSB Brawl. I love that game. there is hours of epic fun in it. Hours.
This weekend I needed to run a long, slow 7km. Sorry bloggers but no running photos this week as I needed to just run, free my mind and quieten my spirit. I didn't even take music!
Agave Nectar
The talk with Tim and Jerome was supposed to be Jerome and I only. It just happened that Tim was going to ask me something so he accompanied us to Medrano where Jerome’s love of his life was studying. Enough of her, Jerome might get mad at me. HAHA. So, we three talked about life,self , feeling of assurance, rejection, lovelife, crush, etc. One of the things I learned from our discussion is that, even though the consequence is awful, it is important to be true to oneself and just do the right thing. Another thing would be, it is important to be ready but it is better to have assurance from someone you think you can be with in the future. Lastly, communication is really a key to understanding.
We had a great relationship one that I will always keep in my heart. She was, is, and will always be my first true love and maybe my only love because she’s still the only one I want, the only one I am willing to grow old with. We shared a bond and a fire that will never be duplicated or replaced. If she called me today or even ten years from now I know I would run to her wherever she may be.
LindszerWest is not only a lifelong reader, she is a nook owning, bad-boy lover who saw the post announcing Wuthering Wednesdays and just had to jump in! Seriously, she was blasting my Facebook page with Heathcliff quotes *very fangirl*.
I want to look deeper into verse 12 of this chapter:
Every week we do the same thing and I hope I am building this great little child hood memory for both of them and eventually get them interested in cooking more once they are a bit older.
Commuters weary of the all-too-familiar sight of the sea of brake lights atop the Kosciuszko Bridge can rejoice.
8. Keep a daily organizer on your desk.
Launching into the world of soccer fandom with the briefest of knowledge and somewhat limited expectations, I had my supporter’s jersey donned, my support crew assembled, and my gin imbibed. I was ready. I was glowing. I was full of anticipations and sandwiched between a doctor and a journalist. And I was subjected to 94 minutes of a game in which nobody scored. Nobody. Torture.
The Youngest Templar: Orphan of Destiny
TIME: 11:18 AM
Start today. Maybe you got a job offer, don’t assume it is a blessing from God. Yes, I know it seems that way but just pray and make sure it is for you. Maybe He has another job offer in the midst and you decide to take the first offer that’s proposed to you. That first offer might be for someone else, but when you take it, perhaps it was meant for someone else. The other person may now have the position that was meant for you. Now they are your supervisor and you asking why and How? Because they waited on God they have something even better.
Sorry for the bad photographs – it was one of the few sunny days, and unfortunately I saw the reflections of my hands and camera only at the computer (when it was dark again)
- Article 2(5) of the IP Chapter of the Association Agreement has become Article 229(5)
this new prayer somehow feels different. more desperate, perhaps?
The issue now goes to the House, which has yet to consider a separate bil
In this batch of photos I have the bodice on over a mid 1870s bustle and an unfinished petticoat I had laying around (yes, I have a lot of random, unfinished bits laying around). In the next post I'll show you what it looks like over other shapes, and I will solicit your opinion on the probable date of this bodice. In the meantime, here are a bunch of gratuitous close ups!
We have 2 venues to visit this week... Next weekend we're attending my friend Lori's wedding so that will take up an entire wedding planning weekend, but instead of freaking out, I'm attempting to view it as a much needed mental vaca... and I can TOTALLY be on "clean up crew", Lori... aka scoop up whatever you need to while you go off on the honeymoon! :)
I hope I've inspired you to use some of your supplies or DSP in a way you didn't think of at first.
“What bring you here, Sister Lakosha?” Brulee asked, searching the other’s face for answers. “Is this about my sister? Has there been a change in her status?”
754 *D-X/27/1977. “Librarians and the Cause of Freedom.” Annual Convention, Illinois Library Association, Springfield, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1978(2), above.)
Since September, this agent - who really was lovely - has taken on several more clients. My blog roll recently has featured two excited announcements from writers.
Josh has been a big name in the skateboarding industry since he was signed on at the age of 17 with Toy Machine Skateboards, a major skate company, and later with Fallen Footwear, started by previously mentioned Jamie Thomas. After a few years immersed in the culture of skateboarding, Josh underwent a “dramatic spiritual awakening in the midst of a drug trip gone bad and re-dedicated his life to Christ.” After that, he felt God leading him to record music, his other passion (quote from Josh Harmony’s Website).
For thirty seconds, maybe a minute, of free falling, stomach rolling terror, people stand in line for hours. Bone rattling rumbles, hip bruising turns, hands clutching the paint peeling, germ-and-sweat-and-fear-covered safety bar, or flung high and wide in a show of bravado and faith in the maintenance man over entropy, they clench their teeth and scream silently, scream aloud, laugh and puke and wonder how long until it ends.
It just brought the whole experience back. The smells and sounds of the hospital, the feeling of utter loss and pain, the screams and the tears.
Yi Sung Yol (이승열)
So that’s how I ended up in a Chinese restaurant in London’s Soho with four New York Jews and that’s where the question came up:
If New Yorkers are myopic, Kansans are blind.
- Experiment with different avenues of healing. Conventional medicine is of minimal use, since the system is set up to offer short doctor’s visits followed by a pat on the back and a prescription. The healing arts cover a vast field, and there is wisdom out there that you should seek to take advantage of. Don’t give up early or easily.
What's your relationship status? What are your dating woes? Do you ever worry that you're never going to find your soulmate? Do you think your city plays into it? If you're in a relationship, how do you feel now? I would love to hear... xoxo
If they’ve never covered that subject before – say, they write for Knitting Monthly and your release is about industrial springs – so much the better. They’ll learn something, and won’t their readers have a nice surprise when they give it that double-page feature?!
I’m unconvinced by Direct POD as a self-publishing solutions provider, as a printer, their quotes are competitive, though, I think they need to look at their hardback print prices, which seem above the sharp end of the print business.
That's why I write--and read--middle grade fiction. Because I expect a good book to take me someplace I've never been, to do something I've never seen done, to wow me in ways I never knew I could be wowed.
Latino/Latina 205 (20.6%)
I thought Loni would've been better by now
crashes head-on into the bliss of our march vacation,
I promise you that
I tried top practice my skating on the wooden flooring this morning, I can skate in a circle but I suffer badly when trying to stop. I think stopping is one of the fundamental things you kinda need to learn first lol I can't even get that right.
The truth is, I'm not sure what is going to happen. All I know is that our relationship isn't as healthy as what I want it to be before committing to each other for life. I know that our therapist believes that the hard work can't happen without Joe doing some seriously tough stuff first. As someone who has seen the benefits of therapy, I know first hand that although therapy can be life-changing, it also takes some significant amount of time. And you have to be motivated to make the change.
My flag needs Less red, more white. Less blood, more lives.
I’ve only ever made the trusty old Fantasy Fudge recipe that is on the Kraft marshmallow cream bottle, so I figured it was about time I branched out a little, and after quite a bit of searching I decided to give this Snickers fudge recipe a try (found at Culinary in the Country).
Because real cowboys ride in the rain.
by Benjamin Fulford, 3-26-12
“What happened?” I asked. Now the tears were flowing freely down his face and he shook a bit in his voice.
Life goes on.
Looking forward to: Picking out a name!! We have two-three we like. Starting to see my doctor every two weeks now. Continuing to feel her move.
Martin Kušej (director)
A thrilling story of romance, danger, and intrigue, THE MEPHISTO KISS continues the marvelous mythology that began in THE MEPHISTO COVENANT.
please tell us about what you are doing for Learning at Work Day,
After a couple of hours of child neglect, I was confronted with milk filled cereal bowls and general mayhem around the house. Nothing had been done. No homework, no chores, nothing. And when I expressed my discontent, I was greeted with whining and gnashing of teeth. Being a mother is a thankless job.
29. Eleventh Hour - Lady Marmalade (5:03)
The closer we get to the wedding and the closer we get to more freedom (in the form of me becoming a licensed psychologist) the more these questions and discussions are imperative and hold more weight.
We love you!
We took daughter skating for the first time today.
I have been reading ...
So after I grabbed a can, I headed back to my office. The patient was standing in the hallway.
The Brown County Fair. The post may have been started on 9/6/10 but the date we went to the fair was 8/22/10. I wanted us to do something with Nolan out of the ordinary as within a few days his life was going to be flipped upside down with the birth of his brother. So we went to the fair. We walked around, we petted the animals (cows, sheep, horses, bunnies, etc),
I do know that you have to report all your foreign income, though you don’t necessarily have to pay an income tax on it below a certain threshold. You also have to report all your foreign assets, for example, a home owned jointly with your spouse or any bank accounts on which you have signatory power, even if the income in it is entirely your spouse’s and you haven’t earned a single cent that went into it.
Yes...I use newspaper to "mulch" around my plants. haha It's WAY cheaper than the black landscape fabric (that I also used.)
can't resist the challenge of capturing them with my camera.
Over the weekend, Bryce was on a hunting trip in South Dakota. I definitely missed him but enjoyed having a little extra time with family and friends (it never seems that there are enough hours in the day and days in the week to see and spend time with everyone I want to). Friday night I had a pizza girls' dinner with JLA and SEG. Afterwards, JLA and I headed over to her boyfriend's apartment for a band and party. She and I had not seen each other in well over a month so it was great to get some special catch up time with her!
And it is:
It’s a middle class place, River Downs. Even the horses there are middle class—maybe lower middle class. They are like the wait staff at Bob Evans. Sure, they are in the same industry as the waiters at Jeff Ruby’s, but who are we kidding, it’s a different world. River Downs horses work their butts off, just like their brethren at nicer tracks like Churchill or Santa Anita, but they look a little older and they run a little slower. And like at Bob Evans, they get paid much less. I like River Downs much better. It’s where the real, hard working folks–and horses–go.
Start watching NAU!
I shrugged. “I…of course I mean no offense, but…”
I fear that I won't ever feel adequate enough. I know, that's another issue. I have to love myself no matter what what but my big problem is perfectionism and with that comes comparing myself to others. It's hard when I see my friends and cousins, etc. building homes and families for themselves or advancing in an already established career.
The president’s spokesperson, Reuben Abati, could not be reached to comment for this story. Calls to his mobile telephone was neither answered nor returned.
Take, for example, another couple in ministry in a community that is not supportive of women. Let’s call them John and Jenny. John has the visible leadership role, though Jenny has the clearly stronger leadership traits. John and Jenny have a pretty egalitarian marriage, all things considered, providing Jenny with the space and opportunities to grow into her leadership gifts more fully. Yet, like the elephant on a leash, she has been conditioned to subordinate herself to his leadership in the community.
“For they being ignorant of God’s righteousness, and going about to establish their own righteousness, have not submitted unto the righteousness of God.”
“Hey, you punks!”
Presidential scholar Stephen Hess, of the Brookings Institution, said the president should ignore the whiners and have fun. "The history of presidents' vacations is that they can do no right. So my advice to the Obamas is while the economy needs stimulating, they should spend-spend-spend and, of course, try to have a good time," he told Whispers.
I was going to give her the cup cake girl card, but when I saw this image, I knew I had to make her this one.
Then they see it can be done.
94No craving void left aching in the breast:
Korean Students Speak – I also came across this courtesy of Wet Casements (mentioned below) on tumblr. It’s very poignant to see that the students have written how and what they feel. Some of the comments are quite emotional and touching, while others are angry, naive… You can scroll through for ages. This kind of thought provoking material really inspires me. I don’t know how it inspires me though.
Image: Mo's Digital Pencil
For, oh, my soul found a sunday wife
6)I will forgive myself for all of my mistakes,there is no purpose at all in looking backwards......ever.
The hardest thing about writing superheroes is making the audience feel that they are in peril. They have so many powers that you’re pretty sure they’re not going to die. Even if they don’t have invincibility, if they’re a main character you know they’re too successful to die. You have to emperil the smaller fry. He did, it was great. And there was so much that was funny. I think the Hulk got most of the best punchlines. Well, you know. Physical humor.
of those facts. So one more time I am going to
- Career Path: ADH (Finance and Administration Head)
This collection has a summery, beach-y feel, but can definitely be used on more than just those types of projects. And don't you just LOVE the colors in the collection!?! Yellow seems to be one of my favorite colors to use lately.
Almost from the start
In a large bowl, combine the powdered sugar and cocoa powder. Beat the butter with an electric mixer at medium speed for about one minute. Reduce the mixing speed to low, and add the sugar/cocoa mixture about 1/2 cup at a time. Halfway through this process, add the milk and vanilla. Once all of the ingredients are thoroughly incorporated, beat at medium speed for about two minutes or until fluffy.
The thing is, football stadiums are the least of the problems. Ukraine has a massive shortage of clean, mid-range hotels… something like an Ibis or Holiday Inn Express.
It's oddly comforting to realize that this is really nothing new.
The western radical left, and its proponents around the world, take pride in a critical, anti-statist approach. In their fashionable theories, however, there is a certain paradox, usually swept under the rug. And what have milking cows to do with all of that?
I seriously am so blessed to have her as my MIL.
What the winning GOP candidate needs is to tell America, and the world, who his Cabinet will be. Do that, and the Dems do not stand a chance.
“Good heavens, Smacker!” I exclaimed. “Were it not for the pre-existing canine theme, I would call you a sly dog! Did you not suffer from pangs of guilt in procuring Matron’s motherly embrace through deception?”
Sandra: I am currently not reading as much as I would like because I’m in the middle of editing my next release, Sara’s Smile. I love reading on my Nook eReader and prefer short novellas that I can read in a night or two. I usually read before bed but I also love to curl up in my living room on a Sunday afternoon and get lost in a great story.
She’s a gift from above.
Hope you're having a marvelous St. Pat's! I'm off celebrating my birthday, wearing green (as is proper for an Irish lassie born on this marvelously lucky day) and I'll be back with my next posting later this weekend.
I’m really not sure which figure this panel is named after, but I prefer to think it’s for the human figure with the claws- it makes the the idea of why a figure like that would have been carved there much more interesting!
For such a small fest, the beer selection was quite good.
In addition to the TEK cancellation application (noted here by the IPKat), the Court of First Instance heard another Community trade mark appeal yesterday in Case T‑149/06 Castellani SpA v Office for Harmonisation in the Internal Market; Markant Handels und Service GmbH. Castellani applied to register the sign pictured here as a figurative Community trade mark for "alcoholic drinks (except beers)" in Class 33 (this was later narrowed to "alcoholic beverages except beer, liqueur, sparkling wine and Champagne"). Markant opposed, citing earlier German registrations of the marks CASTELLUM ("wines, with the exception of sparkling wine", in Class 33 and CASTELLUCA "wines", in Class 33), maintaining that on account of the similarity of the parties' respective marks and the identity of their respective goods there existed a likelihood of confusion of the relevant consumers in Germany.
As in the Bonds case, the issue is not whether he used PED’s but whether he wilfully lied in saying he did not.
the presents strewn around
As a result of this, Omega Securities did not have sufficient collateral to
Who wouldn’t love the freshness of you? Your uprightness? Your stiff upper lip-ness? Somebody’s gotta do it and it might as well be you. Besides, a lot of national holidays land on you so we could say you are an honorary Sunday for parts of the year.
Manic tendencies
Suddenly I felt eerily tired and could hardly bear all these people around me, a side effect commonly experienced after having spend time in self-imposed isolation.
Meredy xo
Don't fax me your life story, just post me your sim.
9. Corundum
Asset Finance 9
on grids, representation and maps?
Lasher says it's supposed to be a sad poem, a result of his "Tennysonian, not to say Vergilian, mood."
The most recent reminder was provided yesterday after I made a comment about a film's title (“Occupy Wall St: The Revolution Is Inspiring” by Tim Schwartz), which I find anything but inspiring. I overstepped when I then commented negatively on the film itself, which was unfair and uncalled for, because I've not seen it.
Intertwined paths made of varied stones: dirt, gravel, paved.
Key phrases-
But nothing resembling a spiritual marker that identifies and can be pointed to in days ahead that would make me say – see Lord, this is a reminder – a memorial of our agreement – remember and extend your hand, or thank you for always being there for me, or I show it off to my guests who come and visit and take time to glory in God.
I know this is no excuse, but when you start to grow up and have other things to do, you don’t have the time you once had to spend every moment with friends.
The next one is an ideal appetizer containing only 15 calories per tablespoon with no fat and is high in fiber. Healthy and I hope it will be tasty.
There is a growing group of people out there that call themselves preppers. They are not necessarily preparing themselves for the total loss of society as we know it, or the zombie apocalypse (which my husband is rooting for, but that’s not the point!). Most of them really just want to be prepared in the event that one of three things happens: the loss of a job or spouse, a natural disaster (hurricane, flood, earthquake, tornado, blizzard, etc.), or a sustained power outage. These are the most likely events to happen that will have a serious impact on the comfort and well-being of day to day life.
in life could only come through his hard work and categorized as lazy folks
Good luck. And remember, all entries must be received PRIOR to the first pick being made. You’re on the clock!
However, the “award” for the highest Affinity Ponzi scheme prosecution for the year goes to Minneapolis. Trevor Cook recently pleaded guilty to a U.S. District Judge that he had defrauded investors out of $190 million from an elaborate Ponzi scheme involving forex trading and the use of sponsorships from a Christian broadcasting radio host named Pat Kiley. Mr. Kiley’s radio program, “Follow the Money,” was carried on more than 200 radio stations. Cook promised “risk-less” forex accounts as the avenue to riches and claimed to have over $4 billion under management. A tearful Cook received a plea bargained sentence of 25 years in jail, but must assist the court in recovering whatever remaining assets can be found. A court-appointed receiver has already begun collecting assets and implementing an approved “clawback” process to reclaim any gains that other investors may have received. Cook’s wife is the first target.
The old rogue leaned over and picked up the book he had thrown at his son earlier and settled back down into his chair. With all of the children gone, he finally had some peace and quiet. With idle curiosity, he opened the book to see what was inside. He began to read over some old passages he had written after the journey to the planes. He remembered seeing the book at the market at Sasserine and thought it a good idea at the time to write a few thoughts within its pages for such a time that he couldn’t remember the minor details of the adventuring days. “Damn paladins. Damn dwarves.” He muttered and looked out the window near his chair, “I will have my revenge Durvek. I am a patient man.” With his anger abated, the cansin looked down to the book and began to read.
A new novel by the master storyteller that explores what it means to go home
But it concentrates on services like Rypple, Chatter and Jive, (the former two owned by Salesforce with Jive one of the company’s partner services) which makes it a bit self-serving. There are plenty of other enterprise social clients – including Yammer (which just acquired oneDrum to compete with Jive), Jabber and a host of unified communications clients from Cisco, Telligent, SocialText, NewsGator as well as entrants from Microsoft, SAP and IBM. These are the shapes that SoMoClo has taken in the enterprise.
Oh wait one more thing, the other day I was posting my last post and I was done in about 20 minutes or so. Man I thought, I'm getting pretty good at this.The next day I read an e-mail saying I had forgotten to link. Yes, I had forgotten to link all my challenges. I thought that was so funny, having a Dory moment.lol
This does not fit the picture which the media, and particularly the academics in Collages and Universities, responsible for teaching the next generation of young Americans, want to present, and , in fact it is not the picture they present.
And so began the editing process with my talented, brilliant, lovely, stupendous, invigorating (is that enough, Lisa?) editor, Lisa Mangum. Imagine my surprise when she gave me 7 single-spaced pages of notes for suggested changes. At first I wanted to throw up but then felt much better when I realized none of it was TOO major. My plot and characters as a whole were safe.
Happen to One of Your Employees
A gesture I saw up late./
The context where the word was used more than any other was in reference to actors. Critics would talk about an “understated performance” as if it was a good thing – it can be a good thing – and there are numerous performances that I could cite but here are three: Robin Williams in One Hour Photo, Colin Farrell in Ondine, Steve Martin in The Spanish Prisoner – three actors renowned for their over the top antics who dialled it back to deliver pitch perfect performances. And all a long way away from Croy.
The trio played the so-called Chop Suey Circuit for a number of years until they disbanded, at which point Hoo Shee went solo for a time before retiring to raise a family in the late 1940s.
Local franchise owner Frank Weiskopf also spoke up in favor of the plan, and guaranteed that the defendants would receive a fair trial.
It is with tons of excitedment that I can introduce Miss Penelope Doroth.y Marquez! Penny for short. She was born Friday March 23rd at 5:12 AM.
Everyone deserves to –
This is sponsored content by BlogHer and Kellogg's.
Being true to yourself, being different than what the world expects of you is extremely difficult. You are not just fighting an inner struggle, questioning if staying true to yourself is the right path, but also fighting the world, which wants you to be the same as every other type of person, and to think like everyone else. This is not a fight which you win and move on, but a fight which stays with you your entire life, no matter how successful you become, or how many times you prove them wrong. That is why it is the hardest battle.
Just leave me a comment below with your email address and wa-la, you're entered!
I heard from another insider this morning who has a variety of contacts with intelligence agency personnel, central bankers, military officials, et cetera.
Train the body to be strong.. The body has a magical capability to shift the brain and the mental thinking patterns. And finally find some role models who had tough times, read their life’s.. get momentum and go take Action!!!
In the past, geese have been removed by being rounded up, stuffed into crates and gassed to death by agents with the U.S. Department of Agriculture.
I got word today that my second in the Mickey Rangel detective series, tentatively titled The Lemon Tree Caper. This is very cool news. I had a ton of fun writing this one, getting Mickey on the case for a second time. Now to get to work on the next.
P.S. If you and your coworker decide to start running during your lunch breaks, perhaps you should pick a different time of year than June to start. It is REALLY hard to stay motivated when its 106 outside. You don't get valuable advice like that very often, I'm sure, so I'm just trying to be a good friend here...because I'm currently the smelly girl in the office, and the least I can be is a good friend.
It’s Perfect that Sam and Jaine have such an adversarial relationship that quickly turns to heat; it’s perfect that they seem to share the same passion for cars, values, neighborhood and many other things as well. It makes the relationship a natural and not a Soul Mate At First Site kind of story. And Jaine is no TSTL heroine – when Sam tells her to stay away when he goes to crime scenes, she doesn’t think she has as much experience, skill and upper body strength as a trained cop and follow him into danger – no, she’s smart and stays behind.
The cloning of man and woman
The Jetta TDI appeals to a different sort of buyer than the other green cars we’ve been covering in this series. It’s more fun to drive for a start, which will immediately appeal to some buyers over others.
Gregory: Lindsay what happened to Newt Gingrich
The Healing is a great second book in this fabulous series. I highly recommend you start the series today, if you haven't, and continue with this book, if you have! I am anxiously awaiting the third book in this series to see what happens to the next "Kentucky Brother"!
Father, please pour on her your enabling grace as she strives to be my helper,
Jermome Weeks the entertainment reviewer was really a dick head to a lot of productions in Dallas but he didn't really go after us with a hatchet and he more than liked my voice. It was the first time I was paid to act and sing in a live theatrical show. I think half the people involved in the show are dead now but it seems just like yesterday we were rehearsing in a hotel ballroom space where the director Jack Pressley was in management at. Worst toupee on the planet but he was sincerely driven when it came to live theatre and plays/musicals that affirmed the plight of the gay man in the 90's.
I've been informed by about everyone that I haven't posted any new pictures for awhile, so here is what has been going on with our little family.
Over on the East side-
Paint stripping. Off the cabinets. Oh boy.
Davis achieved the highest credentials as an actuary and became a principal in a large firm while still in his twenties. He currently manages an employee benefits consulting practice that covers the southern region of the United States, with offices in four cities.
I can't say enough about my new psychic friend. If you're interested in a reading (he does phone and in-person readings all over the world), drop me a line (christine@poletosoul.com) and I'll send you his information. It truly is a gift.
‘So what are we waiting for, exactly?’ Felicity asked, taking them out of their first truly awkward moment.
By the mid-17th century European whores had largely figured out the visible signs of contagion, but unfortunately both syphilis and gonorrhea can sometimes be transmitted by asymptomatic individuals and so even though the rate of infection among better-informed prostitutes was lower than among other promiscuous individuals (such as members of the upper classes), it was still higher than among the less-promiscuous middle classes, giving rise to the bourgeois notion of prostitutes as carriers of disease. By the early 19th century all but the least fortunate streetwalkers were scrupulous about examining customers; in French brothels the madam herself generally performed the check before allowing a client access to any of her staff, and in English and American establishments the whores were quite as careful as modern girls, lacking only latex condoms as the final precaution. As one customer of a Storyville brothel (quoted in Whores in History) wrote, “She approached and seized my genital organ in such a way as to determine whether or not I had the gonorrhea. She did this particular operation with more knowledge and skill than she did anything else before or after.” But despite such published accounts and the research of medical doctors like William Acton (who despite his moral opposition to prostitution pointed out that whores were consistently healthier than other working-class women due to their precautions and relative affluence), the myth of the “diseased whore” grew and in 1864 the English Parliament passed the first of several Contagious Disease Acts, which were rationalized as measures to root out venereal disease in the armed forces but were actually nothing more than anti-prostitution laws.
And I feel no closer now than when I've begun. I've targeted examples, and planted a few markers, but they are markers in a soft and shifting sand. This is one that won't go away for a while for a while.
"Michael, stay here." The Baba Yaga's voice was harsh, like sandpaper. "Control yourself."
Based on thirty years of research, Kamen reveals that there was less terror, bigotry, and persecution associated with the Inquisition than has been previously reported. He reports that the Inquisition did not enjoy widespread popularity, in Spain or the rest of Europe, and that it was used as a device to scare off enemies.
"Morning"
Spain can claim 5 restaurants on the list including Arzak at no. 8, whose joint Head Chef Elena Arzak was awarded the Veuve Clicquot World’s Best Female Chef award.
Future of the Left – sheena is a t-shirt salesman
Do we look like the kind of band that plays Free Bird?”
I should note that it's not so much pain itself that causes me to wanna sleep more (if possible) but the energy it consumes.
Last, Thursday, I got to be on a fashion show not to watch but to be at the back stage. Yes, I was one of those who we see on events, running around, carrying clothes, dressing models and fixing their wardrobe. I was a styling assistant for the Style Origins 2012 (Ayala Fashion show)
The next day, of course, it rained. Nonetheless, intrepid explorers that we are, we decided to go out and See The Sights. Well, see Roubaix, anyway. Roubaix is part of the Lille Metropolitan area, and whilst a town in its own right, acts a bit like a suburb of Lille itself. (I can't imagine living there and never visiting the big city, though I'm sure there are those that do.) It's on a metro line from Lille, so off we went.
For another, you see,
Which of your posts do you feel didn't get the attention it deserved?
Undid me. By Richmond I raised my knees
Three views of the Woolly in different stages from early inflorescence white and woolly and as a mature flower.
Generika Drugstore is pleased to announce the winners of the Gadgetulations Raffle Promo held on February 15, 2012 to April 15, 2012. The grand draw was on April 27 at the head office of Generika in Paranaque City.
Since having to follow this restricted calorie diet my naturopath has me on, I have relied on Katie at Dashing Dish’s low-cal recipes. These pancakes are protein-packed and yet so low in calories for the flavour, I can’t get over it! I have made these about 4 or 5 times now, doubling the recipe each time to freeze extras for future breakfasts. The only change I made was to the frosting – I halved the amount of maple syrup I included; I didn’t feel it was necessary. I also didn’t use stevia in the pancakes or the icing – I don’t like things too sweet in the mornings and I really didn’t feel they needed it, but if you have a major sweet tooth you may.
-EC
Heavens to Betsy (Lola and the Boy Next Door by Stephanie Perkins). The name sealed Betsy’s vote with me.
The 2012 Volkswagen Passat fuel economy ratings are spot-on with its direct competitors and the TDI diesel model is the game is good mileage for a gas / electric hybrid in the class.
There is a 10,000 volume research library on the premises, housing materials from the Army and Air Force, as well as reference works, artifacts, private collections, and primary historical documents. The library is available for use by appointment.
** B/X is an abbreviation for "Basic / Expert," referring to two connected sets of D&D rules released by TSR in 1981. As it happens, this is the same ruleset that Labyrinth Lord, the newly-released "retro-clone," clones. Why buy and read the B/X books if I already have (and happily play) Labyrinth Lord rules, you may ask? Well, we old-school gamers tend to be a bit obsessed with our hobby, and some of us (inlcuding me) indulge our obsession (and our nostalgia) by collecting old versions of the rules. This is fun because despite Labyrinth Lord's status as a "clone," there are subtle differences between the original B/X presentation of the rules and that found in Dan Proctor's excellent Labyrinth Lord books.
I had to be a secret squirrel, as no one was left looking after the home front, and you know what they say about putting info out onto the internet! I didn't want to come home to either nothing left at my place, or a family of 10 who had moved in and made themselves comfortable!
So my experience with the elusiveness of vacuums leaves me bewildered by the number of vacuum cleaners out there, if nature abhors a vacuum, then ten thousand times more abhorred is a DIRTY vacuum.
Hoagy Carmichael was a master song-writer. His 1930 composition “Up a Lazy River” became a jazz standard. Louis Armstrong’s live take on it soars above the hundreds of covers of this song. Here Louis and His All-Stars work their magic at the 1958 Newport Jazz Festival. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TVMTwxLY7b4&feature=fvst
Let me know if I'm treading on anyone else's toes.
How did the immigrant feel about this quaint Victorian bit of our culture? They continually tried to burn it down. The 1997 attempt didn't quite succeed but they persevered and finally achieved the desired result. Within the year the Spanish landlady decided she'd had enough. Young's Brewery, who owned the place, decided it had become a liability. Burning a pub down is against the law.
This Lyman Spar-T press was purchased through an ad on Craigslist. A woman had bought it at auction for her husband and son, but neither had an interest. After that it just became a toe-banger in the workshop till time (and sore toes) prompted her to answer my ad. See, I run a pretty much full time ad on Craigslist as a buyer of reloading and shooting gear. It doesn't produce often, but sometimes I can rescue something good from a poor fate.
We decided we could slip past that one …. looking away…. because ….?
that problem. He is quoted as saying he wrote one page of masterpiece to ninety-one pages of shit and that he aimed to put the shit in the wastebasket. I’m thinking the toilet would have been preferable.
Being too shy to ask shouldn’t condemn someone to being left at home. Recruiting new hunters is more than stats and programs. New hunters are right under our noses and they are made one hunting trip at a time. They can be our friends, our family, or co-workers. These people are the future of hunting, and it’s our duty to find them… just as someone found us. It’s our duty to Protect What’s Right.
like the leaves around a tree
No, you're not seeing double. This is indeed another Hello Kitty cake. There are some subtle differences though, if you want to compare. Go ahead, look between the two and we'll play a quick game of Spot the Difference. Ready? Go! ... How many did you find? I'll give you the obvious point for the Happy Birthday Michi. You'll also notice that this newer Hello Kitty has three whiskers on her right cheek instead of just two. If you looked crazy closely, there's also no gapping in this Hello Kitty's tank top or pant leg. I'm probably the only one who notices that though. Inner critic being harsh and all. Oh, and this cake was another vanilla chocolate chip too!
2) Do not tell the children how to spend their own money. Have little talks about money wisdom, as described in #1, but let the children make their own choices and encounter the consequences thereof (without nagging or "I told you so"--that's the hard part). I do violate this principle in one small way--I begin the children with a $3 per week allowance, $1 for spending, $1 for giving back to God, and $1 for saving. When they have enough money saved to open a bank account, we help them open one. But I do insist they divide the money this way. At some point (and I suppose my oldest is at this point now), I'll just give them the money they are allotted and let them make the divisions, which is what CM suggests.
Top with cracked pepper and enjoy!
Finally, “coordinated”? Few public policy efforts have ever had the massive institutional and financial coordination that the climate change cause enjoys. That tiny Heartland, with but a single annual conference and a few phone-book-sized reports summarizing the skeptical case, can derange the climate campaign so thoroughly is an indicator of the weakness and thorough politicization of climate alarmism.
I am so excited as each little thing gets done.
Anyone who has been paying attention knows the craft distillery movement in America is on the upswing. The question is, how far is up?
Give Glory in Everything
Or, indeed, any film that has been adapted from a video game, ever. Unwatchable garbage designed to appeal to unusually dim-witted thirteen year old boys.
Then, at Space Camp of all places, I found out that I am totally claustrophobic. Totally freaked out on the Mission Specialist simulation. And then I got motion sick on the gyro. So embarrassing! Especially as a precocious, yet oddly oversized, tween. And then, most horrifically embarrassing of all, the flight instructor tells me that in order to become an astronaut I will probably need a breast reduction because they don’t make space suits that big. Seriously. At age 12. (And, trust me, it certainly hasn’t gotten any prettier since breastfeeding two babies.)
This data cries out for explanation, and almost no one has the gumption to write off as sheer dumb luck. Some scientists agree with theologians that it is best explained by a divine act of design. Francis Collins, while skeptical of intelligent design in biology, warmly embraces the idea that the physical constants of the universe were orchestrated by a higher power to make the evolution of life possible. Even the long time atheist philosopher Antony Flew could not explain away the data and changed his mind about the existence of God. But this sort of move is not a popular one with leading physicists.
Max also has chosen to only listen to a few people this year at school. In his defense though, right now he can barely hear a thing due to fluid in his ears. Trust me, I'm sure my neighbors will be glad when Max can hear the TV again!! (he is getting another set if tubes this Friday). So I have to wonder if they are really talking so he can hear them. Are they giving him time to respond? who knows. Is he just being stubborn? Very likely.
They are blessed!
Construction has begun -
Dr Who theme tune - the original - was one of those things I'd wait for on a Saturday afternoon after World of Sport had finished. Mum was usually preparing Saturday tea, which was always ham cobs with butter. Normally as a kid (bear in mind I'm talking not even 10 years old at the time), I'd have dozed off on the settee, so the cosiness of the coal fire would leave me feeling snug and the familiar sound of my mother moving back and forth from kitchen and living room, accompanied by the chink of china and cutlery just added to the feeling of a safe and loving environment for me. The those initial 'dang-da-dang' synthesizer sounds would spew from the tv and mum would call to me, 'Mark, wake up, Dr Who is starting!'
So... gasp... I RE-USED A PREVIOUS COSTUME. But I did re-vamp it. The first iteration, thrown together last-minute back in my grad school years, had sparser leaves, only safety-pinned in place. So, hours before I was to leave for the ballroom party, I jogged over to Kmart and picked up another bag of fake autumn leaves (it's ridiculously easy to find fake autumn leaves in October), and I stitched them all in place so they wouldn't get mussed when I danced. The garments to which the leaves are attached are four pieces (skirt, tunic, Turkish bodice, and scarf) that I acquired during one of the summers when I worked as a sales wench at the booth of delightful designer (and all-around kind and beloved gentleman) Steven Overstreet, at the Southern California Renaissance Faire. Those were good times, they were.
We also do a lot of character meet-and-greets. I'll tell you about those too. You might notice a lack of Disney villains in my Disneyland characters, but there is a reason for that! She's four and scares easily.
For Arsenal the formula is simple; six points and third place is secured. Had they beaten Wigan, that might have been less pressurised but they did not and that is that. The three points could equally be applied to Blackburn or any other side which should have been put to the sword but were not. It is too simplistic to see the season’s end as down to one result when others have contributed no more.
- the way you have to hold your lunch box walking into school
On aside note, I have had a hard time with getting all of my prayers said. When I have company over I need to say my prayers before I leave my room in the morning. I cannot wait until nap time to do this because then it does not happen.
- 1/4 tsp cumin
The longest book content wise was Catcher in the Rye by J. D. Salinger. I do feel like I’m going to offend a lot of people but this is on my list of books i really dislike! Although its not a very long book, it felt like it while i was reading it!
Now all I need to do is figure out how to get my background (hand stitched and beaded silk fusion) to extend all the way down the sides instead of just at the top of the page. Sigh..
This week I had been catching up on those overdue critiques for some writing colleagues, enjoying my zombie flash challenge and the diversity of others' zombie stories, doing some academic reading for a two day workshop I am attending in August…reading, writing….writing, then reading etc. Drowning happily in words and not waving at all.
Of course, the War Powers Act is hardly an improvement on the U.S. Constitution because it does allow the president to go to war without the approval of Congress. But President Obama refuses to follow this law.
I don't think you can see in this photo but I sprayed with Ranger Perfect Pearls Mists - inference red (pink) onto the pink papers and leaves, it really glimmers and catches the sun - B-E-A-UTIFUL!
"We simply cannot allow these kinds of terrorists to be able to go into Afghanistan, attack our forces, and then return to Pakistan for safe haven and not face any kind of pressure from the Pakistanis for that to stop."
‘No, sir. His moustache is very becoming to Mr Niven.’
You know, even though I've been sick, and ache like I've been trampled, I 'feel' good! I love doing these reviews and I love having these giveaways so I can share my excitement with you. Life is good!
it is not poised on the tip of your tongue
Something to put on in the day or night.
Favorite place to eat: SushiZone
MORE to come as WAY tooo many at the moment to put on here in one post:
So I filled in the cracks where I could.
As always, thanks for stopping by and looking, I appreciate your comments and critiques
He has had the week off and I have been stuck here at work = (
Hope you are finally enjoying good weather.
- Pile the broken meringues on top of the cream
When the New World Order is instituted, freedom will be gone from the earth.
Once again, I think it’s all about perspective.
Well, how about a trip to Wittenberg to see the church where in 1517 Martin Luther nailed his 95 theses on the door? I suggested.
Conflicting impressions: Alex may have needed to know how to kill and skin animals. I didn't. Too real for me.
I've read 120 books in 2011, and looking back over my list, it was interesting to see which books have lingered on in my memory, and which I had completely forgotten about. Others I read, enjoyed (or not) but promptly forgot about.
b) cutting 10% of the Federal employee workforce and freezing the income on the remaining workers.
every steps i take is so screw and very negative thinking
Wild Bill is the first film directed by British actor Dexter Fletcher (he also co-wrote the screenplay) and he's chosen a quirky tone, constantly shifting back and forth between the myriad of little stories lived by all the film's characters. It is a bit unsettling at first, but give it a chance, as the major plot lines clear up and the film becomes not only much easier to follow, but also becomes quite funny and charming.
I don't have to explain the caption, but I will anyway in case it's not obvious. It's called "flawless" because you can't see the blemishes on my skin, my teeth look nice and white and my face shape looked good at that angle which, to me, made it look flawless. And it wasn't edited.
Bill: Lots of good memories of mom as well. Aside from her natural beauty, I remember she had the toughest gig in the family as the Sergeant At Arms of the household. She was more practical than an idealist, strangely unsentimental, though with a great sense of humor, and had an opinion on just about everything, except that she would never talk about herself and her own feelings. But whenever I think of her, I think of the time that dad would come home at the end of the day, I can still remember the sight of the two of them performing their daily ritual of a big kiss on the lips, one that you could also hear the sound of way down the hall. The memory that is my most bittersweet is the time she suffered her final heart attack, and as the paramedics were wheeling her out to the ambulance, she looked up at me, with a loving smile and whispered, "Take good care of yourself, Willie......It's your turn now."
By the time I finish writing this post, Christmas is over around the world. Did you do much? How do you spend your December 25? Perhaps you have a strong faith and celebrate by prayer. Perhaps you're consumed by family, gifts and food aplenty. Maybe you're some place in the middle. A little of that. A little of this.
11 German Overalls
Well, firstly, for the most part, let’s say 95% of the time, there’s good reason why your story, sample chapters, proposal has been returned to you unwanted. (Yes, there are genuine times when editors, agents, publishers get it wrong, but don’t kid yourself that they just aren’t seeing your genius all the time.) Get your disappointment out of your system in whatever way you choose (I’ll tell you mine one day), and then sit down and have a good look at both the rejection (if you’re lucky enough to receive any feedback), and your submission. Be honest with yourself. Was it absolutely your best work? Had you revised it to within an inch of its life? Had you let it sit alone in a drawer, and come back to it with fresh eyes a few weeks later? Had you researched the journal, agency, publishing house you submitted to thoroughly, knowing what does it for them? Do you read almost everything that’s currently being published that resembles your own work? Are you a lucky person? (Okay, forget that last one, but I'm reminded of the person who said, Funny how the more I practice, the luckier I become.)
Now all I do is kiss you through the bars of a rhyme,
Before I even got to the journal, I was hugely impressed by her packaging job. The journal was snugly wrapped in a piece of sheet music from what must be an old music book, tied with linen thread, with a little note tucked right in the front. Amazing.
you now lie; eyes closed; silently
- Queries addressed to "Dear Agent" (or anything similar!)
Bob Chapman & National Intel Report: They Will Pull The Plug On The Economy By End of The Year?! Total Financial Collapse Worldwide? Alex Jones: Financial Terrorism! TSA Holds Texas Flights Hostage! UN Slams Israel For Ill-Treatment / Eviction of Palestinians! Israeli Troops Shown Posing With Palestinians! Inside Job! The People Behind The Collapse of 2008 ! Illuminist Banksters! Bob Chapman: The Tyranny of The State! The Move To Steal Your IRA & 401K! Jim Willie: The FedRes Will Inflate To Infinity! Gold Will Surpass $5000 – $7000/oz. Silver Will Surpass $150 – $200/oz! Ashkenazi Jews Are NOT Descendents of The Biblical Israelites!
1 tests
A) Did the coffee cause it?
Anyhow, today I have two topics to discuss and to start it off, here’s little something you don’t hear very often these days.
It rained yesterday. I made the best of it. The students were anxious and ready to leave as soon as they arrived. Conflicting directions from the administrators didn't help the mood of anyone, as it made our morning routine a lot of hurry-up-and-wait.
2) Hbibi Dyali
Anyway....I had a little red Mitsubishi Colt (2007 reg) and it really was very strange driving this car. For a start, my car is probably particularly low to the ground and so driving this red car I felt as though I was about two metres up!! (yes, I know that's an exaggeration, but it jolly well felt like it.)
onBackButton: function()
The acts of the sinful nature are obvious, Paul says (v. 19). His point may be that while the “desires of the sinful nature” (vv. 16-17) are hidden, the acts produced by those desires are public, plain for all to see. So an evaluation of our outward behavior makes it easy to see if we are gratifying the hidden desires of our sinful nature. But since some of the acts listed also refer to inward attitudes of the heart (for example, hatred, selfish ambition and envy), the word obvious is probably not drawing a contrast between hidden attitudes and public acts. Instead Paul seems to be emphasizing that the Galatians do not need the Mosaic law to define the nature of evil. Since he has just told them that they are not under the supervision of the law (v. 18), it would be strange if he now turned to the law for moral instruction. In fact, he does not do that; he does not describe the acts of the sinful nature as transgressions of law. His list of vices is similar to many lists in the ethical teaching of the Greeks and Romans of his day. Pagan philosophers often published lists of vices and virtues. So when Paul says that the acts of the sinful nature are obvious, he means that all of us already know what is evil when we see it.
I'm so glad I finished recapping our trip to Europe. It was something I wanted to get out of the way so I would actually do it and not put it off. I'm still waiting for things to settle down since we got back. And by things I just mean the mundane happenings of life. All the crazy catching up. It's so time consuming and I feel like I need a break. Even though I just had one. Isn't that horrible?
But that doesn't mean we can't do some little updates!!
Home at Cedar Creek
If you want to see what that looks like when we're in charge, follow right along as I intermittently add photos to this album.
Best Lighting Design FRANKENSTEIN Bruno Poet at the Olivier
Thanks, Barb! It's been great getting to know you.
I arrived in Killarney a little before 9am to find the bike rental place wasn’t open yet. I milled around shivering until 9, when it soon became apparent it wasn’t supposed to open until later. Nothing else in the town was open either. Then, in a stroke of genius, I decided to go into a hotel and ask if I could change into some dry clothes in their bathroom.
I wrote about adding your signature to your jewelry over at Art Bead Scene. (And I am totally crushing on how good this macro shot came out. I only used a +10 filter for my lens! Incredible!)
High Court judge S.P.B. Hancke ruled that it was proven beyond any reasonable doubt that gardener Joseph Hlongwane, 22, had tortured to death the elderly, unarmed Helen Lotter and her daughter Alice , 57, on March 6 2009. No explanation was given by the gardener as to why he had displayed such extreme cruelty, carrying out at least three hours of torture. He will be sentenced on Wednesday 9 June 2010.
What are your plans for fall decor? When do you start decorating? Did you already start? ha!
sun and blue sky
'Tis so, I deem. The answer's clear!
Valley
Last Sunday we said the below prayer of confession together. I am blessed and want to be at a church that can say this prayer honestly – and we did. I think a lot of people want to be part of a church like that; and I want to invite you to be a part of our church:
Now that there is a mound of baby things in my living room, I really need to do something about our closet/bedroom situation and figure out where this little guy's HQ will be. Mostly, he will be a roamer for the first little while, snuggling in his car seat or pack and play where ever we happen to set it up - our room or the guest room. And when he starts sleeping decently, we will set up the real crib in Sam's room and the brothers can hang together. But in the meantime...where do I put his clothes? Do you know I have less than 3 weeks to figure this out?!
Today me and my brother Eric went to town to watch the yearly Motorcycle parade, it’s each year on Good Friday. But sadly, it was snowing. So sad!
Do you know how hot humidity makes my life?
Brrrrr - am sure even with wet suits the North Sea is cold in February - also we don't get the waves here for surfing - mad people!!
The book, if I could be sure its contents were accurate, would be very easy to recommend to a broad, general readership of Australians interested in biographies. If you don’t particularly care for precise accuracy and just like a good yarn, potential flaws and all, more power to you, and this is a great book for you. If you’re happy knowing that the historian, in this case, has taken liberties which are rather more obvious than usual, again, I’d say its a great book for you, and hope you enjoy it.
(3)Variable involvement of cardiac and other bodily systems.
Cuddles and Kisses,
* Re-pot some plants
I credit my fairly laid-back social views to a lifetime of more-than-a-few Mardi Gras seasons. You can't grow up watching transvestites and grown men dancing in feathered costumes without being affected on some level.
2.Calling Lightning pt 2
Okay, so cutting the book down to three hours is difficult and you're going to have to miss out on a lot of atmosphere and character development and even some minor characters. David Lean managed the task amazingly well.
2. The Psalm begins with a joyful invitation to praise God, that opens immediately on to a universal perspective: “Sing to the Lord, all the earth!” (v. 1). The faithful are invited to “declare his glory among the nations”, and then to tell “of his marvellous deeds” (v. 3). Indeed, the Psalmist directly calls on the “families of the peoples” (v. 7) to invite them to glorify the Lord. Lastly, the Psalmist asks the faithful to “say among the nations, “the Lord reigns!’” (v. 10), and explains that the Lord “judges the peoples” (v. 10), and the whole “world” (v. 13). This universal opening on the part of a small nation squeezed between two great empires is very important. This people know that their Lord is God of the universe and that “all the gods of the nations are nothing” (v. 5).
Metroland presents itself as community minded, but eschews controversy that impacts its protective shield of protecting the ad base.
My belly button is on the verge of popping out, which is really saying something, because I have the deepest belly button I have ever seen (though to be fair, it’s not like I wander about poking my fingers into women’s belly buttons to compare), and I am definitely slowing down. I have a little waddle, which I’m going to call cute even though I suspect it’s more ridiculous than cute, and I can’t walk up a hill without taking breaks along the way.
Entry #46
Literally. I hated running.
Best Actress Greta Garbo, Camille
You are wasted time
You are valuable to me because of who you are, and you are valuable to others who know and love you because you are you. And you are inherently valuable in the universe. Call it God, or nature, or humanity, any way you look at it, you are made valuable.
Overall it is an easy read. The story flows fluidly as the river Ganga in the background – rustic and honest. While reading the book one forgets what language one is reading in, for the lines are literal translations occasionally. It may be part of the reason the lines seems so close to the heartland or it may be why Bhagat has such wide readership. Nonetheless, one cannot argue the appeal it has and the fact that Bhagat portrays a slice of life many can relate to. This one too seems to have the potential to be made into a commercial potboiler like his other works.
100% Handmade : Hand cut, hand sewn & hand finished. Outstanding craftsmanship & unique design.
Adoption is...
All proceeds from this upcoming event will be going to Make-A-Wish Foundation UK, the leading wishgranting charity that grants magical wishes to children and young people fighting life-threatening conditions.
“I won’t be doing any more big gallery shows for a while, it’s all a bit dodgy. I’ve come into contact with a lot more villains since I moved from vandalism into selling paintings. The art world is full of shady people peddling bright colours. Anti-graffiti groups like to say tagging intimidates people, but not as much as modern art. That stuff is deliberately designed to make normal people feel stupid. I could try and get more legitimate mural work, but scaling a drainpipe is still probably a lot easier than getting an original idea past a committee.”
For such an awful feeling race, this is the most hilariously perfect finish line picture I have had to date. You would think I won the whole race with the excitement going on there.
“And everything goes perfectly on the way there. Traffic’s not too bad on Sheridan, and I’m cornering the car like it’s the Indy 500, and we’re listening to my favorite NMH song, ‘Holland, 1945,’ and then onto Lake Shore Drive, the waves of Lake Michigan crashing against the boulders by the Drive, the windows cracked to get the car to defrost, the dirty, bracing, cold air rushing in, and I love the way Chicago smells–Chicago is brackish lake water and soot and sweat and grease and I love it, and I love this song, and Tiny’s saying I love this song, and he’s got the visor down so he can muss up his hair a little more expertly. That gets me to thinking that Neutral Milk Hotel is going to see me just as surely as I’m going to see them, so I give myself a once-over in the rearview. My face seems too square and my eyes too big, like I’m perpetually surprised, but there’s nothing wrong with me that I can fix.” (9-10)
Another image. It's me walking out my front door and her running towards me from the house next door. She flies into my arms and I pick her up and twirl her around. We're saying hello after she'd been away for three weeks.
Lt. Steven J. Bates, 42, New York, N.Y.
So as soon as I discovered blogging I split it up, my thoughts and views went onto Joy Frequencies, my poetry onto Out of My Ocean, and my Astrology onto its own site. I also used to have an online image gallery for my painting and digital art too. So that is how it started! :-)
Assalamualaikum and hello dear friends,
Home
dim Fluffy
THINGS TO KNOW ABOUT THE SIGN UP PROCESS
It wasn't much of a sunrise, but what I did get to see was pretty spectacular on my drive in to work this morning.
I am loving all the bright and beachy themed accessories out right now.
For you, Marton & Lani, happy anniversary. Remember the yesterdays, plan your tomorrows and celebrate your today. God bless both of you.
Shallow urban lives? I didn’t have a shallow urban life. I had two children and a career. I’d just been through a very traumatic relationship breakdown and a period of severe depression. And I certainly didn’t force my children to move 100 miles in a ‘quest for rural romance’. I wanted a better life for us all, away from a situation that had caused me immense distress.
LOS ANGELES (CBS) — Police arrested seven people after breaking up a brawl involving a large crowd outside a club in South Los Angeles Saturday.
Captain Maeric looked at the strewn files for a moment, shocked at the sudden event as he had slapped the file down on th table, almost as if he had somehow caused the event. It only took him a split second to recover. "Frak'n-A we're under attack!"
With the assimilation of meditation into daily life, the fifth state of consciousness, called cosmic consciousness, dawns. Cosmic consciousness is perceiving the whole cosmos as part of oneself. When we perceive the world as a part of us, love flows strongly between the world and us. (Love again is not an emotion but a state of being. It is not a melodrama expressed by endearments but our very existence.) This love empowers us to bear with the opposing forces and the disturbances in our lives. Anger and disappointments become fleeting emotions that occur momentarily and then vanish.
Courting prospective customers and retaining new ones is, not at all, a hit-or-miss effort – even the faceless conglomerate has to know what these people should say a few sure services or products to improve it, with a view to boost sales exponentially. A peek into the mind of the unusual Joe after he purchases and uses, say, a particular brand of laundry detergent, may make the distinction between that brand changing into a family name, or one that disappears after a number of months as a result of lackluster sales. Surveys may give the corporate a greater insight into what the market thinks, and what extra might be accomplished to enhance the brand’s title and fame.
The Sharps moved in over New Years and we invited them to the park that Saturday. Max was sick, so Walt stayed home with him, and LeaAnn took the other two to the park. It was great. The boys played together, and LeaAnn and I had a lot in common. Right away, we had sucked her into our babysitting co-op and dinner swap group.
We trudge over to Walmart (oh and the kids at this point are just about as fed up as I am) and sure enough, no tank. Then it was to a different Petco, which I walked out of because I wasn't paying their prices. I managed to convince him to get the damn plastic tank. So back to Building 19 it is. I still ended up paying almost fifty bucks for everything needed, I was not happy about that one. At this point I was even willing to pay more money for the ferret that the kids really want, as least a ferret is fun. Fish are a waste of fifty bucks.
Since they couldn’t agree they decided to ask the old man. They approached him and one of the students said to him,
Should have listened
If you don’t have primroses in your garden, don’t wait. This is the time of year for the best selection!
Incidentally, Clifford isn’t the only Irish writer to trade in ghost estates for his fiction, with Tana French and Rob Kitchin’s latest offerings also employing the abandoned developments literally and figuratively. “Speak,” as Hamlet might have said were he wandering around the desolate wastelands of suburban Ireland, “I am bound to hear …”
Good Afternoon Blogger Friends,
True dat, dearest and fictional Kathleen Kelly. True dat.
The same man who (co)wrote, directed, and produced it; Tom Hanks. Just like Hanks, Larry Crowne is a relatively sweet and inoffensive rom-com, but it’s a pity that it suffers in just the same way. It’s well-intentioned fluff aimed squarely at the middle-aged market, where “quirky and cute” seem to have been mistranslated into “bland and conventional”. And all too often, boring.
For lunch I'd set up a buffet table full of simple, delicious food. We'd have fresh-baked bread and creamy butter, cold meats and cheeses and salad, lots of fresh fruit: crunchy apples, juicy cherries, plums and berries, served with whipped cream. In memory of Gollum, we'll serve sushi, and for those with elven tastebuds I'll try to recreate lembas bread with one of the many recipes available online. Finally, there will be a big cake, but not a stodgy fruit cake, something tasty and flavoursome. I'm thinking of a spiced pound cake or suchlike. This table would be set up first thing, and available to nibble at throughout the day, for those feeling the need for second breakfast, elevensies, afternoon tea... etc. etc.
We both let out a sigh of relief when it was over and left the chapel. Across the street, there was a chain restaurant called "Carlos Murphy's". We went directly to the bar and ordered two double shots of tequila. We tossed down our drinks and returned to the condo.
Not only have I changed my behavior and habits when it comes to my old friend the urinal, but even in much more profound ways. I find that I am a much more compassionate, empathetic, understanding person than ever before. I have a great deal of compassion for my paruretics for sure, but I even find myself feeling the effects of people who suffer from other conditions. I can remember in the past, I would curse the condition that shackled me down. But now I realize that paruresis itself was not the chain holding me down, it was in fact my own neuroticism.
I consume myself in your fragrance as I hold you.
We're not at that point yet, but there is hope.
"Do you want it, Jessica? I bet Rachel would love it." The shopkeeper said. "Only seventy-five dollars."
If someone wrote a biography about you, what do you think the title should be? Ryley would title the book “Meet the WAR Boyz”.
In the butchers I bumped into the other member of the remedial stream of the slick Latin American salsa class. We had howled with laughter at the back, as the sleek class rotated one way, and we, fumbling, stumbled the other. We hadn't seen each other for over a year. Barely have a language in common. But as we spoke very slowly together, out her story tumbled. Her daughter, 18, Italian, is about to go to university in UK. And it's a long way from Kenya, from their relations elsewhere in Europe, and from Mum. Their international school has just organised an evening for the parents of nearly adult children about to move to university in third countries, to lead the parents through the stages of supporting a child in a third country. How to underwrite a phone contract or rental agreement when you don't have a bank account or residence in that country. Why it matters to have more than one sole piece of photo ID.
Gameplay is rather simple, two buttons, one for grabbing objects and the other to jump to solve the puzzles that you’ll come across. Some are rather simple, while others require a bit more thought, but it never gets frustratingly difficult or too easy.
But in the end we’ll see whats what
The big thing to know about Via Napoli is this: the food is great, but the portions are huge… and as a result it has the rap of being overly expensive…
Then add the granulated sugar bit by bit, while continuously beating, till soft peaks form. It should hold its beak shape when you lift the whisk up, but shouldn't be too dry and stiff. (Refer the mac bible for explicit guidelines)
This may surprise you coming from a beauty blogger, but I hate shopping. My husband feels like the most fortunate man on earth because shopping for me means being in the store/mall parking lot waiting for the doors to be unlocked, dashing inside with a list, and returning to the car within the hour, before the crowds show up. To be that organized takes research, but I am it's the only way I can handle it.
that 'My Life In The Bush' was so under-rated at the time.
No the wolf
There are so many bad memories that I don't know which one is worst. One episode that "traumatized" me was when I was about 7, cuz lil' brother was not one. We were sailing on Mediterranean Sea to go from Cogolin to Saint Tropez and my brother's hat took off from his head to fall in the sea. Don't know why but I was really really sad and scared about what could happen to the hat in the water... (oh yeah, if you didn't know, I may be really really strange and scary !)
"The Art-House Adam Sandler Movie"
Also available inside the railcar are souvenirs, maps, postcards, clothes, cd’s, old photos, paintings, & books including ones from local author Seth Bramson historian for the Flagler East Coast Railway,… all of which are ready for purchase upon demand. Not for sale are some historical photos posted on the walls along with newspaper articles and other information about Pigeon Key and 7-Mile bridge.
i look at the beautiful breath of life that was once held in full by my sweet, dear friend, melissa and i wonder how one soul could yield so much fruit. it was because she chose good soil to sow every Word of God into every situation, major or minor, in her day. each day. every day. in the small moments and the grandeur spaces of time. it is evident in the witness of her friendships across the globe and in every person eternally stirred by her gift of God’s word sown within her very being.
Some of my best friends in the world, Jen and Chris, are going through some tough times right now too. Jen and I have been friends since our freshman or sophomore year in high school. I think we met when I made her laugh in our history class. And I met her husband, shortly thereafter because Jen and Chris were highschool sweethearts. Chris has been out of work for over a year. Thankfully, he's had some consulting work and Jen has had some babysitting jobs to keep them afloat, but I know that it's been hard. Anyway, Chris does this kind of work on the side so I asked him if he had time between interviews to fix my bathroom because I'd much rather the money go to them than some random company.
The perinatologist we met with was very kind. I asked him about statistics surrounding full term infant deaths and he said it is hard because in the United States they group statistics for stillbirths after 20 weeks up to the first 6 weeks of life. He said in perinatology land (thats what I call it) they cluster full term still births up to the first 6 weeks of life which he said is VERY different than a baby who dies at 24 weeks. He said they should not be classified together because a full term baby is viable and is like loosing a child who is 18 years old or a child at 47 years old...the pain is just as great because our child died before their time...but their life no matter how brief should be considered precious and valued. (I am sure women who loose their baby at 24 weeks feel like they lost a child too...I am just writing what the perinatologist said.) He said that full term infant death is actually pretty rare, because it is not preterm labor in which the baby was born before they were ready....full term still births with undetermined cause occur about 1/10,000 or even 1/100,000. He said that he thinks they may know the cause in 50 years...right now we call it bad luck but something happened, we may not know why the baby died but there was a reason.
Anent the invocation by the respondent Judge of the Constitution’s non-impairment clause, petitioners maintain that the same does not apply in this case because TLAs are not contracts. They likewise submit that even if TLAs may be considered protected by the said clause, it is well settled that they may still be revoked by the State when the public interest so requires.
down from "floor four" ( said in a British accent ),
and on my way to healing, and this post is no exception.
This song was also featured in the 1985 movie, First Born, starring Christopher Collet, Teri Garr, and Corey Haim. It can be heard in the scene where Collet’s character and his girlfriend (played by Sarah Jessica Parker) are shopping for clothes in a mall.
Instead of just stacking the boxes right on top of one another, they have been staggered and alternating areas between containers have been left empty to act as walkways and balconies. Container walls that face the exterior of the building or sit between other units are insulated using concrete fire walls and rubber.
The conference was dedicated to the late Kaye Coppersmith, a planned speaker and dear friend of the FWA family.
A look at China’s leaders, past and present, and their offspring, often known as ‘princelings.’
"Oddly enough it is just when we think we have cast off our mere humanity that our all too human desires become all the more intense ..."
And big huge props to Kristen Wiig!!! She is most improved.
Oil price have already increased nine times this year by as much as P5 per liter for diesel and gasoline while the price of Liquefied Petroleum Gas (LPG) has also increased by almost P200 per tank.
There are millions and millions of the pope's Jesuits. They are everywhere.
Anyone with a kid in extracirricular sports, insert yours here and do an evaluation of cost, benefits and priorities. It’s not cheap. Do as much as you can, but remember that balance is the key. Don’t go overboard. You want your kids to have fond memories.
Between 2001 and 2007 in his garden near Cambridge, England, Majerus collected both black and white Biston moths in the proportions that were flying in his area (most of these were typica). He put each moth in a mesh sleeve on a tree, allowing it to settle in its preferred resting places at night (which is what they do in the wild), and then removed the sleeves before dawn. Since moths don’t fly during the day, any moth that disappeared by four hours after dawn was presumed to have been eaten (26% of these moths were actually seen being eaten by birds). This was supplemented by Majerus climbing up trees and finding out where uncaptured moths normally rest.
Cover your kitchen cabinet shelves with foil. The foil attracts the electricity and it won’t go toward you. It’s picked up by foil.
Stress can mean hatred towards someone, or simply stress from a situation. It’s obviously very easy to distinguish why someone’s pupils are dilated. You’ll never find yourself looking at someone with dilated pupils and thinking, “Hm, I can’t tell if they like me or want to strangle me…”
the county. These megaliths are commonly believed to have been erected by the ancestors of the Kettahwohnucks for religious purposes. There are also those who purport that the stones are not the product of the indigenous tribes, but were erected by an alien population that settled in the region at some point in the past. The Celts, Vikings, Egyptians, Phoenicians, and even Atlanteans have all been named the source of these Neolithic monuments at one point or another. Many have strange sigils and carvings on them that some believe give credibility to these more outré origins.
It was just me and sis who never learnt how to drive bi-cycle amongst all my cousin's since he feared, what if we fall. Later when I moved to Finland, bike (cycle) being only easy medium of transport I had to learn biking during late twenties, my dad was so much worried how will I manage alone since it was all uphill and down the slope. At the same time, he was SO proud when I learnt, till date he keeps checking if the gears and breaks are in good condition and did I buy helmet? No I still didn't...oh I dislike, it spoils my hair.
uhh.. yeah...
Hadot’s book is, simply put, a potentially life-changing book. While the first two thirds of the book explain how philosophy was a lived practice in the schools of the ancient world, a “choice of life,” the incredible chapter, simply titled “Philosophy and Philosophical Discourse,” brings it all together to show how Ancient Greco-Roman philosophy wasn’t about producing texts, but about showing how life could be lived more fully by means of a series of “spiritual exercises.” What’s so amazing is that despite the fact that Hadot is so historically precise, his description of these exercises is so relevant to the present day, and hold within them the potential for a rebirth of philosophy as lived practice.
places behind its Plateau
BULK FOODS
What I thought about this card then: I didn't see it. It was one of the last Dodger cards I needed to finish the team set.
CT-N has become too vital to the informed citizenry of Connecticut to allow anything less.
This was pretty much the reaction from the media when TeamPoison (or TeaMP0is0N, as I believe they prefer to be called – 83c4U53 U51Ng l337 M4k35 7h3M 3v3N M04r 5C4rY & H4Ck3r15H, or something like that) apparently hacked the MI6 anti-terrorist hotline, recorded the calls and ‘leaked’ them on YouTube.
"Nothing?"
Your “Hierarchy of Entitlement” essay doesn’t mention Jews. I would appreciate if you could further and more directly support your argument as I have mine. I’m curious to see how your metric of who rapes who works out when applied to a group for which it is not even politically correct to note membership. Or how the hierarchy might shape up if it were based on a metric of say proclivity for financial and political power while enjoying relative immunity from scrutiny.
Things you never...ever say to a Special needs parent. In no particular order
Palpatine: sputtering Alright. Stop it. I told you to cut it out! You've forced my hand. stands and holds hands out in front of him, firing purple lightning at Luke Actually, you've forced both my hands! cackles
But, bizarrely, journalists often believe what they read in tabloid newspapers, so this story about the vile rape scene in a hardcore porn movie (which is wasn’t) quickly spread across the world, sometimes using the same words the original News of the World had used.
It gets worse. Manuel tells of shocking death rates, unimaginable inequality, an appalling state of healthcare and high rates of theft as a result of corruption. In short, our country, perceived from the bottom, is in a permanent state of crisis. The black majority is left outside the democratic experiment. Why would a nation engulfed by such challenges choose to take money away from hospitals and schools to host a party?
I just want you to know that I do think about you often, even if I have not made it to the pile of posts waiting to be written.
Banana Sponge Cake
Dressed in a skintight bodysuit, wearing a cropped, punk-blue wig, a ticked-off Perry, 27, prowled across the stage as she sang lyrics like “You chewed me up and spit me out/Like I was poison in your mouth/You took my light, you drained me down…You ripped me off, your love was cheap.”
The results are emailed to you almost instantly! That’s it! It’s that simple! It’s such a relief to be able to see the current market value of your home. Plus, being able to project when your Orlando investment will break-even to become an asset again is invaluable to your decision making process.
I’m not flashy. That doesn’t mean I don’t like to dress up – because I do. Or that I don’t like a guy who likes to dress up, because I definitely do. But when I think of someone being too flashy I think of Birdman. The man wears earrings that my Maw-Maw would wear just because he wants to show the world he can wear some grandma clip-ons that cost him $600,000. No sir. If you’ve got that much money, how about you show me how you stunt by paying off my loans. Now that, that would be someone I could get down with lol.
These are so damn delicious, that I need you to make them right now, eat one fresh from the oven (don't burn your tongue gluttonous fool) and tell me what you think. They take literally like 3.5 seconds to make. So go!
"Is dinner ready now?"
“I understand the cops are quite clear as to what Roquet or his employer Eiffage hoped to achieve by feeding Strauss-Kahn’s voracious appetite for women,” a Parisian source told The Slog this morning, “but not why Roquet brought in Pazkowski and Lagarde to help.”
In Mali, the concept of time is imprecise. The weight of the past is ever-present and the impending future never arrives. The capital city, Bamako, exudes hustle, but nothing ever seems to happen and no one seems to get anywhere. Buildings are perpetually half-built, paved roads become dirt roads (only to be paved again), and change is always ephemeral.
One thing I've learned, from all the time I've spent on the internet, reading, writing, catching up on current events and just plain goofing off, is that time is definitely precious. It doesn't behoove me anymore to waste time on stuff that appears to be blatantly crap. I have a feeling that, just like with William Hung of American Idol fame, the commentary on the content is, in the main, more interesting than the content itself.
When you are reconciled to the fact that each is for himself in the world you will ask less from your fellows.
I just remember absorbing so much. I was understanding that "Christian" in title didn't mean Christian in life - and, I'm not hear to bash on Christian education... that would be another post entirely - and not bashing, just....thoughts. But I guess it was an awakening to me - in that complex and formative year in my life. After an entire year I had tried anything and everything to find my niche. Skater girl with baggy pants and green, yes, green lipstick. Preppy, cheerleader, sporty girl - only, we couldn't afford name brand sports gear or clothes, so, that didn't work either. Book lover - wha???? Babysitters club. That didn't last long as I always seemed to doze off. Anyway, I just couldn't figure out WHO I was. I felt myself grasping at any kind of acceptance. My heart is forever soft for 6th grade girls now.
Well, I just can't beleive how much time has flown by these last few months! I've been working on my own now since August and I really enjoy my job. I love the unit, and especially the crew I work with. They are supportive, funny, hard working, and have your back in a pinch. I am still learning and that's probably why I love it so much, you're always learning and every shift is a new adventure! It's hard to put my experieances down on paper because there has been so many and I don't even know where I would begin.
With warnings I refuse to heed.
U.S. Customs and Border Protection
Crawfish bisque. But a nice oyster poboy goes down pretty easily.
Aside from a glimmer of hope in the Scottish Health Service (http://www.unison-scotland.org.uk/pensions/nhsstrikes.html), UNISON's leadership have - at least for now - decisively withdrawn from the position at the head of our movement which had been held in the three months following last September's TUC mini-Congress.
Quite regularly.
I’ve never watched this show, but the clips I have seen of it and its ilk make such shows look so pathetic that they are not even worth making fun of. Perhaps my opinion of this sketch will change slightly once I review the list of corrections. B
Every time someone makes a comment to the tune of "the title doesn't matter now because the editor might change it anyway," somewhere in the world a book flings itself from a towering shelf. If it's an ebook it contracts an incurable virus.
This fun and informative weekend experience is suitable for beginning writers upwards with an interest in travel writing, food and good company.
- Clean air: I always feel calmer, clearer and more energised after spending time outdoors amongst nature.
Didn’t happen. M woke up in a bad mood. He ate his breakfast but wouldn’t take his pills. When I got back at 8:10, he still hadn’t taken his pills and now was refusing to go to school. I could have left my husband to deal with M himself, but that hardly seemed fair. This on a morning when I had a long list of things waiting for me at work.
Tebbit is as much at fault as Blair, Brown, Cameron, Clegg, etc., etc.
There are so many questions to find answers for…
Know too, that positive changes in your health can sometimes lower your premiums, and policies with loans and withdrawals should be monitored, points out Ferik.
Forgiving and setting us free
Since that day we stayed close. We usually plan on once a month meetings, though sometimes we'll get together to go to a children's museum, or a pumpkin farm, or a cupcake date. :) We've been through the sleepless newborn nights together, the excitement of baby's first steps, and the craziness of toddlerhood. They are an awesome sounding board to discuss not just babies and motherhood, but life in general. When I talk about my "Pumpkin Pie friends," my family and friends know exactly who I'm talking about...and even know most of the babies by name.
In between Sydney and Wollongong in a sleepy town called Helensburg is a little wildlife park called Symbio. It has been there for years and years - when I was a kid, my parents took me many many times. I got to touch some of the animals, and even milk a cow! It's not a huge zoo, but it's great for little kids, if you want a more "cozy" and "intimate" zoo, or if you just have a few hours rather than a whole day.
Lots of pretty papers, ribbons and packages surrounded the Christmas tree on Christmas Eve.............
And here's the big question...What color should I paint my nails?! Right now I'm wearing a bright pink. If I leave them, then I'll probably do my makeup like this...
because I couldn't enlarge the picture when I was putting the words on.
So I am giving myself one rough month to eat and say good bye to my all food, consciously, in full awareness.
Place the large element cluster you made on one corner/edge of your photo cluster. Create another small cluster (using 3-4 elements of your choice) and place it by your photos opposite from your large cluster.
He was, and remains, a hard case. At his sentencing, he saidKe his only regret was not killing an accomplice who turned him in. Kemp did admit to “a deep and abiding sense of remorse,” he said, that his friendship kept him from killing the accomplice.
As I had mentioned months ago, I was basing F's second birthday party entirely on concepts found on Pinterst. With a little tweak here and there, modified to my own ideas, it was quite successful and fun!! The entire family got involved it was amazing. My mom made F a pinterest inspired pink cake. She used her own cake recipe and frosting recipe and not the one on pinterest but she did utilize the concept of graduated pink layers. It was delicious and so cute and pink. My little girl loved it.
I toiled and toiled,
I feel a little disappointed this didn't happen when my letter of resignation slid across the table: Hallelujah plays over loud speakers at a thousand decibels while every single champagne bottle in France spontaneously pops its cork and spiky-confetti bursts out of the ass of every last m-f-er who annoyed me at that company.
He said in a statement they had come to an agreement to continue using the novel for the literature component of the Bahasa Malaysia subject for Form Five students. The novel will continue to be used in Kuala Lumpur, Putrajaya, Selangor and Negri Sembilan.
Apple certainly can’t be faulted for wanting to ratchet up security. The accounts of iTunes users have increasingly been compromised and victimized by phishing attacks.
What to do when your confidence is low? I knew the remedy instantly. My mother is probably the wisest person I will ever meet, and her words do something outside your comfort zone rattled around my head like some medicine that would have to be swallowed sooner or later.
Hilary Swank (Boys Don’t Cry)
The impact this will have on digital marketing and content delivery will be significant. Passive media consumption (i.e. you tell me what I want to watch) has given broadcasters, media creators, and marketers an opportunity to be a little lazy. The fact that people sit through commercials, watch a mediocre television show, or listen to a song they don’t love has been taken for granted. You just have to be interesting enough for me to not want to make the effort to browse for something else. Striving for “just good enough” is not much of an ambitious business model and the “good enough” bar is rising quickly.
For those of you already sick of theatre talk, I will be posting about "Surprise Raspberry and Chocolate cake" on the other blog. So hold onto your socks for that one. The surprise is really *astounding.
See ya next time and happy stitching!
If two input square sentences are matched, and the three input values of each sentence match, the reasoning between the two sentences is the same; square, triangle, circle.
Yours, as a local and not a tourist,
I was baptized for the dead on several occasions in the Ogden Temple while I was growing up as a Mormon in Utah. I remember thinking I had never heard of any of the people I was baptized for so I was unable to say if those people accepted the gospel. Each time I went to do my proxy work I wondered if what I was doing was in vain. I prayed that with all my hard work to stay holy and pure to get in the temple wouldn’t be for nothing. I wasted many hours praying they would accept what I had to offer them.
_NPCScan: Found “Jadefang”!
the hand of the man who withdraws, the woman who
Cristin Bruggeman! Yay! Cristin wins her choice of a chapter critique or a $25 gift certificate.
I can't believe that after Christmas I will have almost 3 months till I see her again. Good thing I will be busy unpacking, learning my way around Virgina and getting settled in. You can believe one of the first things I'll do will be to set up Skype!
Title: Sa Ngalan Ng Ina
Well, if the subtitle doesn't nail it down... the final album mix had several instrumental sections edited out at the last minute by the band and Stephen Street, as they felt it went on a tad too long. This is the full-calorie version.
If you missed it, here is the link. Gift Guides They really are worth looking at if you've got a few minutes. The online catalogs are quite nice and easy to read.
And the world still spins, and all of this goes on under the noses of doctors and psychologists and teachers and therapists who haven't a clue. This naivette can also make some of them rich soil for planting seeds, they have no weeds of worries to choke it out, no stony assumptions that can't be changed and rob it of the waters of truth, no trampled paths where devils take away their common sense and fool them into false answers. I'll be darned if the seeds of advocacy can't produce 100-fold. That's what the truth does. It sets us free! False prophets may try to stand against it, and fool even the elect, but they will fail.
4th of July is coming soon. The long weekend means having friends over, waiting for the parade and staying up night to watch the fireworks. The day is special and there are a lot of ideas and crafty stuff floating around. Hosting a picnic or a barbecue, having loved ones over, give them a surprise and do something special. There are lots of ideas here which are easy and fun!
Every parent knows how much misery an ear infection can cause for their baby. The pain, irritability, and sleepless nights take a toll on the whole family. As more and more parents are learning, the majority of ear infections are caused by a virus which means they will not respond to antibiotics. In addition, overuse of antibiotics results in a range of consequences. What, then, can a parent do to help their baby with the pain and support the body in its effort to heal? Increasing numbers of parents are turning to alternative medicine and natural remedies for help. Chiropractic, certain foods, essential oils, and herbs are just some of the more popular remedies.
1124 ***D-X/31/1991. “Self-Hate is the Hate Speech Most to be Concerned about in Our Circumstances: Reflections upon a ‘Hate Speech’ Encounter with Stanley Fish.” Galliland Symposium, Rhodes College, Memphis, Tennessee. See Items C-1991(5) and D-III/27/1991, above. (Incorporated in Item C-1992, above, pp. 562-66, in Item B-8, above, pp. 31-35 (1997), and in Item B-11, pp. 31-35 (1999).)
Add diced potato. Cover and cook another 15-20 minutes until potatoes are done.
You will have snippets on the history of a restaurant, or of its owners, or of some incident during their travels, of fellow eaters, clear statements on what to eat AND what to avoid. You can use the book as a guide. Or, as I story book, as I did.
Dysart's relationship with his wife has died, he has no belief in anything and this god comes to represent the vitality he lacks. Shaffer called this a study in “professional menopause.” Some regard this as an important play, others see the psychology as popular but it is a powerful experience when acted on stage. The film version failed because they used real horses but on stage they were played by actors in brown costumes, wire masks and standing on a couple of hooves which made it unreal and lessened the brutality.
But seriously, I would be a surrogate for her. I'd have to talk Jason into it, but if Jenni could afford the invetro and everything, I would totally carry her baby. And not just because I could turn to her friend and say, "NOW who's the best bridesmaid, bitch?" Being a mother has been the greatest thing that has ever happened to me, and I would gladly help someone else experience that.
Najib’s administration is also plundering the nation’s wealth with his cronies like there is no tomorrow. Which country and government in the world dish out contracts and projects worth millions and billions of ringgit almost daily but devoid of any accountability. It willingly signs contracts with cronies that disadvantage the government (read taxpayers) because it doesn’t hurt their personal pockets – only the pockets of law-abiding Malaysian taxpayers and the country.
And so, let’s pull out the good Christmas songs, purchase some good Christmas Ales and ciders, and begin to sing, laugh, and share of the ways that everything has changed because God has taken on flesh. Let us think deeply and praise often.
Here I am in glorious Antigua, Guatemala. I have come to Central America to learn Spanish and experience Semana Santa, Easter in this Technicolor land. It is the biggest Easter celebration in the world, begun after the Spanish overtook these lands. The procesiones (processions) and valaciones (holy vigils) have been occurring since the mid 1500s. The procesiones have 7000 pound floats that shudder and lurch through the streets with 60 men, women or children carrying them on their shoulders for 10 to 12 hours. These devotees all wear purple robes until good Friday when they change to black. A corporeal representation of the weight of responsibility and honor necessary to properly eulogize Senor Sepultado, the crucified Christ.
My teeth are very clean, and the dentist worried about the state of my upper palate. Cankers and sore mouth, I think for the same reason I have tinnitus and sore ears and raw nose - allergens a'bloomin'. Or pollenating. Then he asked as I staggered out of the chair, after my poor back. Well, nothing to be done, life leaves it's mark on us. At least my front teeth survive, unlike a patient who fell on her face at the same time I did, and lost teeth because of it, needs a bridge and all. I soaked my mouth in saline and cayenne when I got home, and saturated myself in beer. Usually, I am quite moderate, but today I need some anesthesia. Need to numb somewhat.
When questioned on his choice of party, Tunku Aziz replied: “I feel that I trust the people around me and what the party stands for.” He is also quoted as saying: “I always have independent views. I have been critical on a number of issues. While I subscribe to an organisation’s basic principles, there are times where we disagree. I have always championed the freedom to dissent.“
It's good to have friends to talk to when painting
And Allah (swt) informed that He has given a guarantee of victory to those who will defend Allah’s Religion (true Islam). And there is no consideration for the number of men or for the equipment with weapons but (the most important thing) is: The true faith in Allah (swt) and that the victory is (always) from Allah (swt), as Allah (swt) said:
So I got a job at a timber yard. Got some experience there. Learned some new and inventive ways to swear, developed a rash on my chin that wouldn’t let up and saw somebody lose a finger in a vicious machine. The lost finger was enough to send me looking for a new job. I decided to work somewhere that wouldn’t endanger my digits. After a brief stint of stacking pancakes at the Mother’s Pride bakery I landed a cushy number in a public sector office. The Belfast Education and Library Board, to be precise. Found it mind-numbing but less dangerous than manual labour. And it’d pay the bills until I figured out how to get into the writing racket.
Plain old self-spankings don't do anything for me. Doesn't get into my headspace, and I can't hit myself very hard. In one word: Pointless.
...Of objects
“Not that I speak in regard to need, for I have learned in whatever state I am, to be content: 12 I know how to be abased, and I know how to abound. Everywhere and in all things I have learned (literally, I know the secret) both to be full and to be hungry, both to abound and to suffer need. Here’s the secret: 13 I can do all things through Christ who strengthens me.”
Gregory: he needed those to reboot himself
1. Obviously sorrow over sin, repentance, contemplation are not simply reserved for Lent, but occur daily as the need arises (which is always seems to do).
Boston native John Harthorne was heavily involved with startups during his undergrad years at MIT, and he’d been itching to get back to the startup world ever since, but debt, family and a new baby deterred him from doing so. He spoke of his passion for startups with a Bain and Company co-worker, Akhil Nigam — they knew Bain was a great place to work, but neither wanted to do consulting forever. Then, the world came crashing down with the recession of 2008, and experts were forecasting ten years of stagnation and an economy reminiscent of the Great Depression.
‘House Republicans say they have no plans to pay for the extension of the Bush-era tax rates, a move that could erase the deficit reduction they have achieved since winning their majority in the chamber in 2010′.
… if we think it important that…the accused should have to answer in person… it must also be important that other members of the polity with a role in the trial—as witnesses, as judges or as jurors—should face him in person. There would be a clear contradiction in calling on you to answer in person to us, but refusing to face you ourselves. (see p. 118)
October 5 - Billy Naylor, actor ("Our Gang"), 95
If you’re looking for the sheer gorgeousness of male ass-kicking, go for Gina Carano in Haywire. It was a tricky choice. But the scene I remember as being so memorable was in Hanna, when our weirdly angelic fairy tale princess (Saoirse Ronan) finds herself on a date with a boy, thanks to her new teenage friend Sophie (Jessica Barden, who’s fantastic). Listening to some flamenco guitar music and sitting in front of a flickering fire, Hanna sits next to this boy while Sophie makes out with one of her own until eventually the boy decides the time is right to make a move. We’ve seen this a million times in film — and considering that Hanna has enjoyed all manner of other awakenings with Sophie, we fully expect some kind of never-been-kissed magical scenario here.
“Come on slow poke. You’re late for your big sales meeting! For heaven’s sake, come on and grow some cojones! Hit that darn accelerator. This isn’t high school drivers Ed with old-man Murphy. Go, go, go. Faster, faster, faster. Left, left, right, left, straight. Pass that school bus. Come on you chicken. That school zone sign is just there so drowsy kids can find their way. Don’t slow down; that woman with the walker can make it. Side into the parking spot! You have reached your destination in record time.”
Time for a little shameless self promotion.
In many instances, a makeup artist is a confessor, confidant, advisor, therapist. When you gently cup someone's face in your hands to smooth on a primer or thoughtfully gaze at the face before you, thinking about what technique or color you will choose next, the effect on the person in your makeup chair can be extraordinary.
The Malaysian Insider understands that the latest Umno surveys show that there could be a repeat of the Election 2008 results but with Pakatan Rakyat (PR) getting at least 87 federal seats, five more than in 2008.
Williams-Sonoma also carries Sprinkles Cupcake Mix (chocolate, lemon, red velvet, vanilla). Check that out! Once the cupcakes are baked, decorated and finished; you will need to box them up. I ordered several different sizes of these lovely pink single and double cupcake boxes and inserts from BRP Box Shop. They are excellent quality!! Sometimes I will add a pink and brown satin ribbon to tie around the boxes, depending on who I am giving the cupcakes to.
Until next post,
He knew he had reached success on “ER” when walking in Manhattan, someone yelled “Hey George”.
Rebekah and Naomi Ruth
Thankfulness is something we do not see a lot of now days. Even in the churches we do not see a lot of thankfulness. It is something that bothers me. I am a very thankful person. I am not going to say I am perfect but I am thankful. I admit I have my own problems, who doesn’t but the unthankfulness I see in society and even in the churches just irks me. I have spoken about 2 Timothy chapter 3 before and I would like to go back to it again.
hold on to the branches of Life (God)
Add in chicken pieces, stir until well coated with spices about 5 minutes.
I am so blown away. I feel compelled to buy it for everyone I know.
Here are the Top 10 New Year’s Resolutions That People Make
I know that I can ultimately handle whatever life throws my way but if I had my druthers, we'd all live forever.
This is Gooseberry. Gooseberry was a pain in the butt. It did not want to melt, and I use a Mini CC torch. Because you had to crank up the heat to melt the stuff, it discolors to a darker murkier green than what it is supposed to. The floral cane was made with Canyon de Chelly striped with Lapis, Blue Moon and Cranberry.
4 newly hatched baby birds.
There was a time when my project was at its peak that I went for three days without taking a bath. Of course, I barely left the dorm at that time but, then again, if I had, I wouldn’t have known if I looked like complete and utter crap because I’d given my mirror away too. Over the years though, the rules of the project became more lenient. Ergo, I have become just like most girls. But I can also survive on a mountaintop for two days with less than a liter of water to use for hygienic purposes. Disgusting? I think so too but we, bare-essentials people, are kick-ass like that… or so I’d like to think, haha.
And from that day, if it was one time and not
Till they ripped Time out,
Otherwise, not much has changed (hence the lack of updates the last two days). His lungs are still pretty crappy, but as I understand it, it is a question of just maintaining a holding pattern until he gets bigger (which he's doing: TWO POUNDS!) and his lungs mature. The problem is, how much damage is done to the lungs in the mean time? Who knows? No one. So we still take it one day at a time.
Cayenne pepper– 3/4 tsp. (I added less because I’m a wuss)
Sorry if this writing is all over the place I just have so much to write! LOL
Both of them are city illnesses, but they are not the same.
this was helped by the fact that Jon's mum and dad were also at the campsite in their lovely plush caravan. Most handy.
I surrender to the feet of the guru, & find my refuge in g-d.
He loves Star Wars.
It is so easy to use and knowing my jewelry will last forever makes me feel good about using it.
now:
Thanks to my blog writing I've ended up doing some serious writing. And this in turn lead to me spending Friday afternoon looking through the archives held by Wye Hops Ltd at China Farm near Canterbury.
I get asked a lot about working with white tones when it comes to using Copics. Its a complicated subject because while copic does make an opaque white--it is not meant for covering large areas, it's more of a highlighting color. The actual whites that are markers aren't what most people think of as a true white--and I hear a lot of times from people that they don't like how the white doesn't "look white."
It was a great show with the part of Elle being played by the understudy who (with a blonde wig on) looked just like Reese Witherspoon. Ray Quinn and Les Dennis were the familiar faces but the whole cast were great. It was rather cheesy and some songs weren't as catchy as others, but the main songs made up for it. I have even caught Jonathan singing one of the songs that I haven't been able to get out of my head, and he didn't even go!
This 3-day event features 19 live groups as well as the Mo’Forum, an installation of independent artistic creation. Most of the groups are French, but the two standout acts are Aidan Moffat (ex Arab Strap) on Friday night, and above all, the cult band Television Personalities on Sunday night.
I'd recommend this product for anyone who loves coffee scents!
Stress levels rising. Duck and Cover.
So. This is INCREDIBLY BELATED. As in, it was supposed to post mid-March! BUT.
Owen is doing great at going to sleep. While he usually falls asleep in his 5 minute rock routine, if I have to lay him down awake, he usually goes right to sleep.
Just because I could.
There is something else in our verse for today, i.e. Acts 22:15. “Thou shalt be a witness unto all men.” It seems odd that his audience did not catch that for when he mentioned the Gentiles in verse21, it ignited another riot. In Matthew 10:5, Jesus Christ told His disciples,
If the baby’s heartbeat is low in your belly, the baby is head down.
I refuse to belive it, its spread through the internet like wild fire! and as far as im aware their was no info or anything on Lis having cancer before this. Maybe im just being stupidly Optomisitc :-( You will be missed sorely :'(
(Almost all lies)
Do you cherish your humble and silky life?
2 baby zucchini or other summer squash, stemmed then sliced into coins
Don’t Spam
Palpatine: Now, young Skywalker, behold the power of this fully-armed and functioning battle station! Palpatine presses a button. You may fire when read--
and next thing i am one of the mcbeth witches
An ethnic minority (Darra Singh) chairs a report into the english riots that were predominantly conducted by people from an ethnic background and many immigrants – and the ethnic question is ignored.
But I feel so close to everything that we lost
I also have the letters of Giuseppe Tomasi di Lampedusa, who wrote The Leopard (IL Gattopardo) one of my favourite books and made into a pretty decent film too.
The TITS (Those In The Sun) are those at the top of society, the lucky bastards earning lots of money for being able to fit perfectly into a society which rewards privilege, nepotism, luck, and, sometimes, intelligence.
JT - But that’s my point. So if before the end of the season, if for instance it’s Bill Miller and he drops the conditions about looking for further assurances and comfort on the EBT case, if he drops that tomorrow and says OK, then it’s a newco, an incubator company, there will be then..in the SPL… their only decision is do we give them the licence back, their one-twelfth share. That’s the only problem they would have. There would be no further sanction provided they do it before the end of the season.
The dessert chef took great care of me! Fabulous chocolate/almond cake, creme brulee with raspberries and even my own loaf of zuchinni bread last night.
The colors and joy surrounding this 5k is very reminiscent of Holi, the Hindu religious holiday celebrated during the last full moon of the lunar month Phalguna (late February or early March). Originally, Holi was a festival that commemorated good harvests and the fertile land. Hindus believe it is a time of enjoying spring’s abundant colors and saying farewell to winter. Although the religious aspect is highly emphasized, Holi also commemorates events present in Hindu mythology. During this event, participants hold a bonfire, throw colored powder at each other, and celebrate wildly. This period lasting about two days is also a time when social boundaries are relieved and people of all castes, gender, age, and socioeconomic status come together to enjoy each other’s presence as they celebrate the festival of new beginning.
4. I’d Do Anything
½ cup laundry liquid, rubbed into the stain, will remove many stains. Rub the liquid in with your finger tips, let it sit for 30 minutes, then wash as normal.
BRIZOLA 42
And that's what I came here to tell you, my friends, is that what you see before you is me being NOT CRAZY (as hard as that may be to believe) and that is a result of running.
It’s a lovely picture and her TA wants a copy of it too. The iPad or “Mr Paddie” has really helped on the (double school runs) – see my post “Fun on the school run”.
Slamming inside her in missionary
For rioting, Puay could have been jailed up to seven years and caned.
The layered were edged using Anna Griffin border punches, sentiment from pc and trimmings from my stash.
Next, I learned that although the above instructions sound easy enough to carry out, these macarons were actually temperamental little devils. I discovered horror story after horror story from people on the Interwebs who had failed, flopped, or otherwise been extremely disappointed with the final result of all their labor in the kitchen.
Now for the book’s excerpt…
Oh and the much awaited Night Prince series. YAY! In March she will be releasing the first book about my favorite Night Huntress character. Vlad Tepesh! Aka Dracula, aka Vlad the Impaler, aka Vlad III, Prince of Wallachia and certainly my favorite pyrotechnic vampire. No worries though he discontinued impaling people when he found he could just set them on fire J. I wonder what he’ll do when he finds love.
Funeral pyres, a drought and a rottenness
In parenting our children, help her also to continually show them a balanced picture of what you are like, first, by example and second, by biblical instruction.
was i really that horrible of a waiter to get barely 8%?
The scientists of that time tried to discover what exactly cochineal was – because after cargoes of dried beetles, smaller than peppercorns, had been stolen or intercepted, no one was quite sure what they were. Antony van Leeuwenhoek, who invented the first microscope, initially mistook them for seeds. As science became more advanced, though, dyes were synthesized—possibly the final blow to an industry that had survived warfare and espionage and biopiracy.
When I visited Queyras of France some years ago, the wood carving workshops there aroused my curiosity. Very often it is a family business and one could visit it and buy some unique objects as souvenirs. I bought a wood-carved knife stand in rosette pattern (both sides with different patterns), it is marvelous in shape and is made of Cembran pine wood. I put it in my kitchen and am delighted to appreciate its craftsmanship from time to time. Below is a brief research on the wood carving information unique in the Queyras region.
I didn't have any matching brads, so I used plain white ones, covered them in Versamark ink & then embossed them with Iridescent Ice Embossing Powder. I re-inked them & embossed them a second time, to get a nice sparkly finish. The butterfly had a dose of the same treatment!
The problem is that these States under the AMP only developed over considerable periods of time. It required a very long social process in order that the voluntary administrative bodies that arose out out of primitive society could coalesce into a bureaucratic state apparatus, and even then not without struggle, and repeated complete social overturns as the history of China demonstrates with one Dynasty replacing another. Nor, was the position of these states secured purely on the basis of force. In China, as Barrington Moore Jnr. shows, the State bureaucracy was recruited on the basis of stringent exams. Its true the bureaucracy through its privileged position could educate its children in order to pass those exams, but it was also forced to ally itself with the powerful Landlord class, which in reality provided most of the recruits for the State, and where powerful Landlord families did not have clever enough children themselves they used to adopt clever children of peasants, and train them for a position. In India, the position was even clearer. This Caste system, whereby it was control over the means of production and over the State, which was more important than ownership could only exist on the basis of extensive laws and taboos that restricted entry by birth.
StellaBaby--Hoodi's younger sister, who insists on crocheting granny squares, much to Hoodi's annoyance. StellaBaby flogs her crocheted afghans at the bar across the way from Hoodi's kiosk, selling them to teenagers who need coverups for under-the-boardwalk luv sessions.
I believe in miracles. When I was a child, my family and many family friends witnessed a miracle of healing that resulted in my father still being around to bless my life today instead of succumbing to doctor’s opinions and a hopeless prognosis. I have no doubt of the power of faith and prayer. Rocky’s vet still says she is at a complete loss to explain his miraculous recovery, though to me there is no question.
Take care of your teeth they are the only ones you have.
Other Examples?
he spends a whole lotta time with his beautiful wife Dorothy.
the contents were poured into the dog bin. She would gradually work her way
I don't know if you've caught on by now, but I am EXTREMELY sentimental. It's because I'm a Cancer, I swear it. I am steeped in emotion about the past and memories and dear relationships and life lived. It can become a tidal wave if I'm not careful. I have to remind myself to get back into the present sometimes, or it becomes too big of an ache. A beautiful ache-- NATSUKASHII-- but an ache nonetheless.
FADE OUT:
(Wow – I never thought I’d hear those words after a holiday meal! LOL)
ITD CEMENTATION INDIA LIMITED Financial Result Updates
I would love it if some of you would click on "Follow Me Networked Blogs"on the sidebar under my Facebook badge. It is a requirement I have it on my blog if I want to have my blog posts automatically published on Facebook and Twitter. All it does is you will follow me on Facebook. Thank you :)
Yes, it is a necessary price in such a struggle because revolutions begin with the acts of heroism of its most committed militants before the mass support sufficient to overthrow the reactionary regimes has developed. This means that such militants are isolated and face death since the ruling classes see political assassination of militant leaders as necessary to stop revolutions from gaining momentum. But their martyrdom often becomes a catalyst in mobilising that mass revolutionary support.This is also true of suicides in invading armies since the demoralisation and rejection of war, suffering fatique, PTSD and other health problems that motivates such acts, are also the inevitable product of weakness of individual soldiers trapped in an imperialist army, yet can serve as a spur to more widespread resistance.
Once we actually get started on the comic, I'll be telling you more about the characters. I just don't want to spoil anything!!
If you paid your BPA dues or got a donation during the student workday, you may get your BPA membership card and pin from me. If you have not paid your dues, please do so before Friday, December 16.
Because somehow, I keep forgetting she’s pregnant.
But others, particularly people who do not examine their own choices, are quick to label people who do not support the status quo. Radicals, be they political, religious, educational, or otherwise, are different from the status quo and as such are often viewed with disdain. Those who live by the status quo (I was going to say embrace the status quo, but "embrace" implies that they have thought about it and consciously chosen it, which I doubt to be true) often question all of our choices and the underlying sanity (or lack thereof) that lead to those choices in the first place. When we voice our opinions, followers of the status quo often go on the offensive, demanding that we defend our decisions. To be sure, sometimes they do this in an honest effort to understand - but it sure doesn't always sound that way. Have you ever heard one of these questions?
And I have a closing today. A wonderful seller and a wonderful buyer. Can't ask for more than that!
The Battlestar Orion is the flagship of an advanced training detachment of the Colonial Fleet. The Orion has been on a long and arduous training exercise in deep space, its crew is due for a long deserved and awaited leave. However, their homecoming will prove to be anything but joyous...
Don’t touch your face. People touch their faces instinctively and without conscious thought. But if you want to make a good first impression, you’ll need to be very conscious of where your hands are for the duration of the interview. Keep them well away from your nose and mouth, which can be a turn-off to germophobes. And for everyone else, touching your face is sometimes interpreted as a sign of dishonesty.
Being a writer is hard work, which is why I always keep my stash of M&Ms close by. FYI-M&Ms work magic when writing! And sweet tea, sweet tea’s great too. You’ve gotta be prepared when going onto the battle field, right? (Just go along with it.)
Momentary pleasures
When M asked me if I would be willing to make her wedding cake (and favor later on), I immediately said yes. Not because it's a challenge (this would be my second time), but how can I say no when it's your good friend who's getting married? This is the least thing I can do to show how happy and excited I am about their marriage.
Cut to a trading post. The owner is begging three men to let him and his sick wife live. The leader of the three men says that he can't allow them to tell a posse that it was them dressed as Indians that killed the wagon train. They herd the man, carrying his wife, outside just as Hex rides up. The leader tells Hex that the post is closed. They threaten Hex and he tells them that they need to save their bullets for the Apache
The default position is anti-British and what was normal, healthy patriotism is now demonised as “far-right” and patriots are subject to slander and discrimination. To put things in perspective, there are about 200 investigations into Muslim terror plots being conducted by security services and the courts.
Finally, I made a masculine themed Twinchie using a president image and rub-ons.
and the winner is..
Steve Rogers: Big man, in a suit of armour… take that away, what are you?
By 11PM worship was going full-steam ahead and there was no indication of when I would be sharing. The crowd had more than doubled in size, with 200 or so attending. The time could be best described using two adjectives, “expressive” and “jubilant”. I was taken back to books I’ve read on revivals of centuries past. One of the common-denominators in God-sent revivals is the way in which a congregation steps into a united pursuit of Jesus, regardless of whether they are being led by a worship leader or pastor. The Spirit of God begins leading others to sing out songs, seemingly random passion-filled praying, shouts of rejoicing, etc. I witnessed this happening. Goose bumps. What a work God is doing all around the world. And here I am, in just one small congregation in the midst of a massive city, watching Jesus smile upon His children and their hungering after Him. Do you ever get the feeling like God is setting you up for something grand? Something that you may every now and again get a small taste of? In reality, He’s setting us all up for eternal Heaven, but He’s also setting us up for Heaven flowing through the hands and feet of God-fearing saints right here, right now. Press in! Don’t give up. Our time is too short to lose track of what God wants to accomplish. I have many dreams that have remained unfulfilled, mainly a massive outpouring of the Holy Spirit on this generation that is undeniable even to the secular world perspective. But, here I am New York City, experiencing a trickling waterfall of God’s grace. Jesus makes all things New! New York City made New – That’s one thing Jesus showed me. When the Gospel takes center stage, entire cities are turned into bubbling expressions of the river of life. That is Biblical revival.
Life is for living.
Redding sat back in the plush leather seat inside the chartered jet, waiting for take off. He swirled the ice around in his scotch and soda. He was headed back home, his work done in Germany. Hopefully. Something worried him about Horner though. He couldn’t put a finger on it. Other than the chemist still hadn’t produced what they wanted. They were on a timeline. Next year was an election year and it was vital to stay on schedule. Would Horner be able to get the job done? Redding sensed the guy was struggling. Maybe losing it. Peter sighed heavily. There were always going to be problems with a project like this. It was staying on top of the problems that mattered. Staying organized.
From a theological perspective this research raises a plethora of questions. Is theology up to the challenge of integrating current scientific knowledge into a biblical worldview that is less domineering and more cognizant of the complexity of the rest of creation? Let’s hope so!
After all, what kid wants to sit through a boring ceremony, wearing a jacket and tie,
While we have yet to test the antenna on the iPhone 4, the problems Apple experienced at the launch suggest that the new external antennas are at best equal to the antennas of earlier iPhones and in some cases (i.e. when your hand bridges the two antennas) they are worse. Fortunately, there are indications that Apple is taking antenna design more seriously now. But for Apple, this was a short-term problem. As “Antenna-gate” fades into history, users have gone back to blaming the network for poor phone performance rather than the phone. This is a positive for Apple, but a negative for wireless providers around the world.
David has settled the matter of trust in this Psalm. He takes refuge in the Lord, and will not flee trouble.
— But after finishing one feels to add an “if” in the start of the last line, as the couple fell out of love trying to get their families to like each other.
The Couvent de la Tourette, near Lyon, is one of Le Corbusier's great iconic buildings. It was inaugurated in October 1960 - exactly 50 years ago. It was originally planned as a place of study and residence for up to 80 Dominican friars, where they would spend four or five years training before moving on to other priories. Today it is home to ten friars, seven of whom were in residence the weekend we stayed. The spare rooms provide accommodation for visitors. Largely made up of the architecturally curious and those in search of an environment where they can truly disconnect from everyday life. On the Saturday night we stayed there were probably around 20 guests.
The plot, although not terribly inventive, is quickly paced and has a few suspenseful moments- a mother seeks answers and revenge for her teenage daughter's abduction. This book contains quite a bit of cussing and perversion, which I don't remember from previous books in the series.
Knutson says she and Erik Dorey were coming back from a friend's house at 4 a.m. that morning when their car was shot at 3 times. Dorey was shot in the mouth, and a bullet grazed the back of Knutson's head. Knutson says they pulled over, and Dorey tried to call 911, but couldn't speak because of the gunshot wound. She took over and began screaming for help.
so my goal is to have that ottoman finished before school starts at the end of the month.
The book’s plot and “giant twist” was so obvious that I wanted to strangle, the author for thinking that her readers would be too stupid to see it. Estep’s dazzling writing, fantastic characters, cool world, and the allure of the “magical school” helped to appease me. This series has room to grow, places to explore. In the end this wasn’t what I was expecting from Jennifer Estep, yet it was just what I needed. With ancient gods choosing champions to battle it out and deceit at every corner, it spells wicked fun!
The Magnolia is glued on top of the butterfly with 3d gum on a piece of colored burlap
Once Tommy’s father is dead his last tie to the ordinary chump humans of Earth is severed and he’s a good little brownshirt for quite a while. Until something happens. Until the loss of something that matters to him. Maybe he really does finally win Mina’s heart. And maybe he loses her to something the Narrin did. I wonder what will happen to him as a result, and what he’ll leave behind?
Lovely Links
It gives me goosepimples just to think of it.
Monday - Steak
Commander Dante and Honour Guard
What is Schaffner looking forward to regarding the 2011 “Beer Week”?
I will write the recipe as she wrote; however, I didn't use raisins as I hate them, and the butter amount for the 'sticky' is too much-in my opinion. I did check out the recipe on Food Network since I was too busy vegging while watching to write it down. People who commented said it was too much butter, but I made it as written-too much butter. Next time I make them I will cut it down to maybe 8 tablespoons.
Today, I have a vivid memory of one experience in particular while vacationning one july. I had just arrived Hotel Le Crystal for an extended stay in Montreal to do some writing and simply enjoy some time away from the familliar faces. Immediatelty, as I often do, I dropped off my lugage and walked around the city to find a quite cafe which to make my unofficial writing quaters for my duration of my stay. I remember finding a place by Place Victor Hugo, sitting to a tea and noticing a young lady crossing the street. Now usually the sight of a young lady isn't enough to interrupt my writing, but something about this one made me watch her as she carefreely crossed the street and went into the corner deli. My first instinct was to look at my watch and register the time and make a mental note(this is a practice I to this day maintain, as to have an idea of what time the initial contact was made). I continued my writing and as she walked out the store, made another mental note as to which direction she went.
Told in the first person, 'Bitter Greens' opens with Charlotte’s disgrace and journey to the abbey, where the nuns strip her of her elaborate court dress – so complicated in its fastenings she literally cannot undress herself – replacing it with a simple linen smock and shearing off her hair. Charlotte’s quick tongue and spirit get her into more trouble and she undergoes penances such as lying prostrate for hours on the cold stone floor of the chapel. In this misery, she finds a friend – an older nun, Soeur Seraphina, who takes her to work in the garden and begins telling her a story, the story of a young Venetian girl who was sold to a sorceress for a handful of bitter green herbs and shut up in a high tower…
Before I could shift my eyes from them to Ms. Twister I heard my name called out. Do I need to remind you we are in a large round room where even a whisper carries, well I am.
But the majority of what I see is people enjoying themselves, and using alcohol as a social lubricant. Business meetings, family get togethers, a holiday treat with the partner, a weekly catch-up with others in anti-social jobs*. It's a form of release - just like any drug. But it's one that's widely known, and the effects of it widely known.
By the time of the meeting I had managed to read only fifty or so pages, and some time has passed since, so my memory of the discussion is sketchy, but I'll do my best.
As the daughter of a man who started and ran a tennis club till he died (Max Skenazy, Northbrook Racquet Club in Illinois!) , I’m hoping this suit will be tossed out of both courts — both tennis and legal. – L
I say the gap between how we treat our children and how we treat our pets is rapidly shrinking - and in some ways reversing - so if you're getting bent out of shape about this you'd better just go lie down now.
Tshirts: we all have them, we all wear them, we all store them in boxes, drawers, closets waiting to do something with them. An easy project is a pillow, but the best is a tshirt quilt. I have been researching the topic on the internet and have made serveral myself for family, commissions and friends.
The beautiful elegance of a conversation using sign langugage (I try not to stare as its considered rude within the deaf community...it is the equivalent of evesdropping)
Pastel-colored cable knit sweater tied around line-backer shoulders woman: Because people aren't from New Foundland. It's a dog!
"No WAY."
Secondly, remember what this stress test is intended to do with four Irish banks. Following at least two domestic stress tests in 2010 and one widely-discredited stress test by the CEBS, there is now a need to create a realistic assessment of the final costs of rescuing Irish banks, both for the domestic audience which depends on a functioning banking system and which is paying for the bailout and for the international audience which has lent and is expected to lend to the banks and the country in future. To demonstrate that the stress tests will be realistic, there is a commitment to make the detail of the stress tests available and the hope is that this transparency will dispel suspicions that the Irish banking sector will realise further losses. So in support of this objective to deliver transparency, you might have expected a little more from the CBI.
I've also been designing, erasing, redesigning, erasing, sweeping up the mess of eraser dust, and once again redesigning my next quilt. It is already named but no where near creation yet. It's called "Mama's Got the Blues", and will be an innovative wholecloth using the robins-egg blue tencel I purchased at Houston last year, here's a pic of the fabric:
Start with AHS's Double Chocolate Stout mini-mash extract kit, add 3/4 bar of Scharffenberger 82% and 3/4 bar of the 41% at the last 5 minutes of the boil. Scoop off the "butter" at the end of primary fermentation. Add 4 oz. Raspberry Extract at kegging. Carbonate just a little, then put it on the beergas. Great stuff. Here, I took the Chocolate Wheat malt. It gives just a bit extra body.
can you call a guy darling
arguably as fatty as that of a British diet but what I, and others, have noticed is that Polish diet is generally lower in quantity than in the U.K. For me I can observe this almost everywhere; chocolate bars are smaller, crisp packets are smaller and food portions in general are smaller. Often an acceptable meal in Poland would be a hearty soup and some bread – in the U.K.
Many of the plants are already in bud with the milder weather. A very pretty pale creamy yellow daffodil (unnamed) that I was given by a friend in Orkney is just starting to show. It would have been better if I hadn't stood on one clump.
As with our other favorite diagrams (velocity-vs-time graphs, free body diagrams… hmm, two more subjects for future posts!), IF charts start to become more powerful when you annotate them and use them to write equations. The diagrams in the examples above have already been annotated, so we’re ready for the next step.
I should be receiving this package soon.. at least I think and HOPE so. :)
What is one thing you wish every beginner writer knew?
After having a glass we'll notice it's quiet, check on the kids and give a little giggle of excitement (Ben's a lightweight what can I say?! hehe!) that they're asleep and it's now time for Operation: Christmas Wrap 20 10. If we're smart we will have dragged all the bags out (do you recycle gift bags? I don't buy bags anymore and just keep the ones we get from birthdays and such. Eco friendly baby!) and start packing the gifts for friends, family, inlaws and outlaws. Ben tissues and stuffs, I tie,label and curl.
Today sees the 75th anniversary of the Spanish Civil War. In 1931 with the proclamation of a Republic a Socialist-Republican Government was formed in Spain, which had the support of many revolutionary forces active in Spain.It had a commitment to the seperation of the church and the state, and a commitment to international peace, modern systems of education, land reform, and more equal roles for both men and women. By 1936 the Spanish Republic had recently been revived by the election of a moderately liberal government after 5 years of tension and retrenchment. A new popular front alliance of all anti-fascist parties had swept the country the previous year. However on the night of 18th July , 1936 the army mutinied with their generals against the people. They bought in foreign legionairres and colonial troops and under General Franco proclaimed a military takeover. A bitter struggle had begun.
frame and painted it pink using a soy based paint. It took about 4 coats since the frame originally was black.
The Subhumans have recorded a new album, Internal Riot, and are self-releasing it on Bluurg Records in September 2007. They have been touring Europe throughout 2007 and have a month-long US tour lined up beginning 24 August 2007.
The decision from the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit is only the latest in a legal battle that began with a written employment test for firefighters more than a decade ago, wound its way to the United States Supreme Court by last year and remains a matter of division and concern among the city’s firefighters.
Nifty opened weak and traded in the red throughout the day to end with a loss of 45 points at 5339. The BSE HC index was the lone index to end in the green whereas BSE Realty and CG indices lost the most.
We make a great team! It feels amazing to actually be super inspired again and draw a lot. I had a terrible terrible artist dry spell for like a good year and a half. I couldn't draw anything!
I was really excited to try Yaktrax Pro because without fail, I have a good fall every Winter. Fortunately for me, the lack of snow has made running a lot easier. Unfortunately, it makes making a review for Yaktraxs hard when there is no snow. On New Year's Day, we got an ice, slush, snow mix and made a good testing ground for the Yatrax. I have delayed this review only because I was POSITIVE that we would have some more snow. Well....It is the middle of February and we still have nothing (you won't hear me complain!!).
Hopefully this will help you to make the difficult decision on who to see when you are there. And if you aren't going, this will help you to familiarize yourself with some of the rockabilly bands that you might not know yet.
Pooped from skating.
Albumin – See Albumen.
I adore a high heel, however great the pain.
With a new color palette that I could now draw inspiration from, I decided some coordinating wall decor was in order. While walking through the lighting section in Menard's last week, I saw some ceiling medallions that reminded me of a project I'd seen in this book (and I'm sure the same idea is out there on Pinterest somewhere):
Lately, I have been purchasing a lot of nude-coloured clothing. Especially lace and knitted material. I was ecstatic about my resent buy with this lace, sixties-inspired top and these knitted shorts. They definitely transported me back to the time of Janis Joplin, tree-huggers and free spirits.
Little of that early writing has survived. However, I think I can create a replica, and thought it might be fun to try. What follows is the essay I might’ve written for one of her final assignments of that last year of high school: Pick a topic, any topic, and write a minimum of 500 words.
For the 'witch' poem she asks, "What do teachers get up to when we're not watching them? Where do they go at the end of the school day? Why are they so good at spelling? Some of us think we know...."
Accuracy lies in questioning persons of interest long enough to observe their default behaviors. People who feel anxious usually either freeze or defend themselves, thus displaying behaviors of discomfort. While there are no hard-and-fast rules, the types of behaviors that can signal discomfort, and thus potential deception, include:
Pat: Definitely. It’s earned me a little money and found me a whole bunch of new readers, all for minimal effort and expense on my part.
Rennin – See Rennet.
The particular wall I hit was erected by the masons, Expectations, I could say Great Expectations but Arrogance may be more accurate. I had assumed I would be welcomed on a very prestigious course with rose petals strewn before me by the Dean; he turned up with thorns.
Suddenly, a dissenting opinion arises. Anna Jost, mother of a Geneseo student, says parents have the right to know – there are young ladies on campus – 17 year olds, even. There are events like Siblings Weekend, during which even younger girls will be milling around campus.
For those who already signed up for the 3-month Tutorial ( September, October and November), I will be mailing this tutorial first week in November.
MK Michael Ben Ari (National Union) also arrived at the scene and nailed a mezuzah to the wooden structure being raised by the settlers, explaining: "It's my duty as a legislator".
-crushed red pepper flakes (optional)
Salt as required
I couldn’t care less,now I care less than less.
Now he wanna rap forgetting he fucked up the Under the Sea Remix
III. Never Again.
Looking at you with longing eyes
“Aeons ago, thou wert this hunter, born to Liriope and Cephissus, beautiful than the age itself,
Never forget that you invited them into your life, it was your choice, not theirs.
02 Sons Of Pioneers
Making raw kale taste good can be a challenge, because it has a slightly bitter aftertaste, but I find destemming it and cutting the leaves in ribbons into a "chiffonade" style works well for a salad. When kale is mixed with wild fermented kraut, which has a natural, mild tangy taste that is different than vinegar, I find that it cancels out any of the bitterness of the kale, leaving the sweet taste. Carrots provide some more sweetness, and then the flavor is rounded out with grated onion and lots of fresh ground pepper. I find I can grate the carrots and onion and rinse off the box grater faster than hauling out the food processor. I save the food processor for big jobs
Because we all have a role to play.
If it can be proven that Zimmerman initiated first physical contact, then the “stand your ground” defense would be placed in serious jeopardy and the prosecution would be more likely to prove Zimmerman acted in an “imminently dangerous” manner and that he possessed “depravity of mind.” If Zimmerman initiated first contact, he would be committing assault and according to Florida’s stand your ground law, such a defense only applies if the person is not engaged criminal activity.
First of all, what’s the use of loads of rice or beans if my toddlers refuse to eat it? I also took advantage of a sale on chicken quarters and grabbed an extra ten pound bag. I plan to cook these up and can it. I did this with a bag about 2 weeks ago and figured out that for the price of two cans of chicken I can make 5 pint sized jars of chicken seasoned the way I like it. If TEOTW doesn’t happen, my husband is still happy he can make a chicken salad sandwich without me freaking out over the cost.
Now the good news.
*In January we also took Aidan to Shriners Hospital for his scoliosis. They x-rayed his back and his curve in his spine was at 92 degrees. 92!! How can you even stand up??!! We were all prepared for them to tell us that he would be scheduled to have growth rod surgery (a surgery where they put two metal rods down each side of your spine to hold it in place, and then they lengthen them every 6 months so that you can grow). Instead we were told that they wanted to do EDF casting, and option that we had NEVER heard of. He will have a seies of casts put on to try and straighten the curve. They sedate him, stretch him and straighten him, and then apply a cast. They leave it on for four months and then they do it again. The goal is to get him as straight as possible and then brace it until he stops growing. Then he will have to have vertebrate fused when he is done growing. This option was such a surprise to us. When we got home and I looked it up on the internet I was in total disbelief. We had never heard of it because only 4 hospitals in the entire United States do it. And Shriners in Salt Lake is one of them. The Lord works in mysterious ways. To me it is not a coincidence that we took the first job in Utah, nor is it a coincidence that we were able to find another better job in Utah again. My mom told me once that I may worry about Aidan, but that I needed to remember that if Heavenly Father is looking out for anyone, it's Aidan.
We all played apples to apples and the kids ran around. We all being: jim's dad and step mom lorraine, sister danielle and fiance steve, sister taylor,sister jamie and boyfriend luke and his daughter trinity, cousins mikey, megan and larry (joe and girlfriend laura met us for dinner), brother bob, his wife martha and kids jace and zaden and our little family. Just a small gathering. Ha! We hung out and just had fun and then all went to eat at the classic cup cafe in ann arbor. We had our own room which was perfect for us because with 6 little kids it was loud. Well..let's be honest..the koepfles are not a quiet bunch...lol.
I did get finished with both my grandbaby's special blanket as well as his girlfriends (the baby girl of daughter's sweet friend also due this month).
President Obama would have us believe that we can all spend the day relaxing in a tub while his printing press does all the work for us. The problem comes when you get out of the tub to go to dinner and the only thing on your plate is an IOU for steak.
They’ve asked me to test a few products on our chickens and eggs and I’ve agreed to do so.
Which works for a lot of life, doesn't it? Have a good attitude and the tragedies aren't quite so tragic. Of course, there's bad attitude people that show up in your life. Hopefully you can just shut the door and maybe they will go away. Unless you are related to them and then you have to learn to have tolerance, I guess. And bake them there own rhubarb pie.
An important contribution to the literature of the Pacific War.
You may have noticed by now that I believe sarcasm is the second highest form of wit (lavatory humour being the first). Today, however, I write without even the slightest hint of it.
And would we be so inclined to take that time if everything was easy? If everything sat on the surface and took no introspection?
I’ve heard that I need to “live in the moment” or “walk out of your upbringing” and lots of other colloquialisms that seemed trite and never really resonated with me. I mean seriously where is the instruction manual?!
Finally, the goats are on the LEFT! Did Jesus foresee the world today? (Just joking).
Philistines On The Land
Have you seen the movie Best In Show?
The ordeal she just went through took a lot out of her. She was hungry, tired and felt the need to take a shower badly. She asked Andy when lunch was, and was told she had just missed it. She also asked about taking a shower and was told shower privileges were at two. That was about an hour away. She had time to rest and try to calm her mind.
They’re messing with food chains and water tables all across the country, and they don’t care as long as they can make a buck. And somewhere around half the people in this country think this is a swell idea. Damn liberal eco-fascists, messing with our job creators! Doesn’t matter that we are all of us going to pay for it with some serious drops in standards of living. Well, all of us who can’t afford to pack up and jet off to Monte Carlo or the Alps or that nice island we just bought in the Caribbean.
Cameos from Luenelle, Wendy Williams and Chris Brown (yeah, I’m as surprised as you that he has a comedic side) are goofy without being over the top. What could have been a heavy or corny film is instead a laugh riot that informs and entertains. Think Like A Man is a rare treat; a movie that lets you peek into how men and women think ala Sex and the City, but gives you something to think about and discuss afterward, like the best take-heart conversation from your best friends.
My thought on blogging now is i want this blog to be all about the food i'm cooking with my kids and the experiences i have homeschooling them trough life .
"What is it?", I asked Joanne.
The man who said I am a dog who barks and doesn't bite to the Aftenposten journalist which was not very nice or befitting in the scheme of things and implies very serious undertones.
I don't celebrate Christmas; I'm not a Christian, nor do I go in for mass consumerism gifting and such. In any case, I don't have any relatives with whom to celebrate. To exacerbate matters, Littletree asked if she could have a sleepover at a friend’s house, and be, being quite ignorant of the date, said “sure”. Only after it was too late did I realise it was Christmas Eve.
Continuing on with my inexpensive diy Halloween decor mission, my front door has been magically mummified using good ole fashioned crepe paper streamers. This might just be the easiest and cheapest DIY ever.
Looks like tomorrow might be a rest day, so thinking I will have to find some yoga program to do, Or if the weather is nice, head out and do some photo hunting.
In other words, the oligarchic right never had better whores than the intellectual courtesans at Cato. Polysyllabic prostitutes eager to twist their tongues around fresh rationalizations for a new feudalism.
Today’s customers also want the process to go as quickly as possible!
That’s what I call real Auschwitz chic.
But still I feel guilty. Like I'm selling the Deuce short. Like I'm wasting a precious time in my life that I'll never get back. A year of my life lost to grief, another ten months lost to a pregnancy that feels like a twist of that story we read in eighth grade: "The Lady or the Tiger." "The Baby Or ..." Could go either way. Will I get a baby? Or will that door swing open and reveal a ravenous grief that eats me from the inside out? Is there any way to be sure that I make the right choices to get the outcome I want? Or is it a total crapshoot in which we hope that the randomness of the universe skips over us this time and makes some other sucker its victim?
PU-2 is a gradational purple quad that leans slightly warm-tones on me, which is works great one me. The Eye Color Select range is also perhaps Lavshuca’s most sparkly range, especially the top right shade.
Miranda and Boyd are staying with my mum and Spider and Smudge are being cared for by two wonderful ladies who are staying up here in paradise for a while housesitting for another friend of mine.
Beat the butter and sugar until light and fluffy. Add the eggs, one at a time, beating well after each addition. Beat in the vanilla essence.
Child Protective Services, please don’t wait any longer.
We played the infamous "Diaper Game" and then a game similar to Scattergories. These are the prizes the two winners received. They each got a bath brush (what are these even called??) and a little box of lotion, bath gel, and bubble bath)
Helicopters, Sniper Rifles
meaning more than rutting and
Allow yourselves to become
The Tweet of the day goes to @Sir_Scribbles, a Man Utd fan. He wrote this tweet after he realized that his club might be whooped again by Barcelona.
This week will probably be the only time I'll utter the following two words in succession:
Maybe I would become an astronaut and go to Mars. I’d love to explore somewhere new. There are so many other factors in that beyond what I can do, but I really like the idea of exploring somewhere unexplored. Mars would be good.
While you ask the ridership to accept a fare hike, what is being done to improve the MTA’s financial plan? What structural changes are being made to ensure future financial stability? Is there going to be an increase of services in the future, or can we continue to see the drastic service cuts that have taken place in the last 24 months? Are you building upon technical upgrades? It is important that the MTA communicate with the City at large what they plan to do to improve service, instead of lazily pointing to finger at funding issues.
I do think masturbation should be covered, for reasons that it's had a bad rap for a long time, and frankly I think it is healthy to explore and become familiar with your own body, and hell, if a young person is okay with 'taking care of business' on their own, they may not be so quick to run out and experiment with others.
Giant Dwarf was invited to the Oscars this year by Tracy Paul. The gals & I won't be traveling to Los Angeles for the award show, but 50 pieces from the Starlette Collection will be distributed to celebrities & stylists. Each sparkly piece was handmade & packaged in a Cotton Baglette with a dapper bunny, sporting nothing other than a black bow tie.
Hello friends here is an article on Leadership per kind courtesy my colleague Rajiv who teaches marketing to Final Semester MBA students. Rajiv has had some rich experience in the corporate world and now much in demand as a corporate trainer. Please read his short article.
Everything in life is about perception.
the game's afoot
Covering corkboards with fabric and nailhead isn't new...but Michelle Lee Interiors built her own corkboard out of surprising (and cheap!) materials. What a great way to customize the size you need, too!
Brooke Bessesen presents the habitats of animals that live under the sea using humor and endearing illustrations. The engaging verses, illustrations, and photographs appeal to the child learning to read and to the independent reader. Take a look at her website (linked if you click the book cover) and you will find additional information about how you can incorporate her books into your classroom curriculum.
I hate giving up a dream. The person left behind is not as good. I already know about the bitterness you acquire. Whether or not I can still do anything about it, I want to know what she wanted. I know some of it. I see some of it in other women. I feel like she’s part of a Counterforce against the conformity stretching its fingers across all lands and all media as we become some kind of 21st century monoculture.
I promise I'll get back to news and posts that aren't so full of gloom and doom in a moment, but before I do I must, absolutely must, pay respects to one of the the greatest Soul and R&B singers and songwriters of all time, the incomparable Teddy Pendergrass....
Wondering why women do so much and NEVER know when or how to take a break??? I mean the lady above is so NOT the type of woman that I have EVER desired to be…… I am not and will never be a feminist and that whole era changed the game for women who did not even want to be included in the VERY STRANGE – “but interesting” ERA! ( feminist movement )
I'm A Psychiatrist
(Whoaaa whoa-whoaaa, this train)
scaly-nubile, her voice in the sea
The Dungeons and Dragons community out there should be excited. Wizards of the Coast is working on the 5th edition of D&D! Lots of people groan because of the new books and merch required to break into a new version of the game but what makes this edition so special is the community input. WotC is going to let us help them, that can only be a good thing. I have fond memories of every edition, from playing an elf or dwarf (hey that’s your class!) to playing the dreaded Psionicist in 2nd edition and even further than that dealing with MinMaxing in 3.0 and 3.5. Honestly I have been a fanboi in regards to every edition of D&D but of all the editions out there I have to say I liked 3.5 the best but I like the dynamics of 4th Edition. It’s nice to be able to play 2-4 encounters per session without having the characters rest after every battle because the party casters are out of spells. I’ve signed up to test, and hopefully I will be chosen! I can’t wait.
Smile have fun
I said, "That is you?"
Toby was six-feet-two-inches of pure bliss. He was one of the very few people who can make me laugh out loud. He also annoyingly intelligent; and I loved it.
Methods that can be used are e.g. social (deep) mapping, visualization methods, appreciative inquiry, integral theory. The student researcher will carry out ‘on-site’ participatory research on the sense of place and values of the local population in this area. The research will be supervised by the RSO group (Ina Horlings) and the Peer Group (Henry Alles). If you are interested, please send a mail as soon as possible to Ina Horlings (lummina.horlings@wur.nl).
I was in The Farmers Market at The Grove a few weeks ago, thinking it was time for a little caffeine pick-me-up when I happened upon a stand I haven't seen before Single Origin LA. It looked good and I noticed they get their beans from a Verve a Santa Cruz, CA company (YAY SC!) so I stepped up to the counter and ordered a double espresso with steamed milk. Simple enough, right?!? The cashier looked at me with trepidation, "Oh, OK, that isn't on our menu and the baristas get mad when I take orders that aren't on the menu"... I looked at the cashier with shock and aw on my face, this was just about the easiest order ever... he decided to go for it and put in my "custom" order. So I moved to the side and waited for my brew... when the barista reads the screen, looks at me and says "Why didn't you just order a Macchiato, you know what you ordered is a Macchiato, don't you?" At this point I was not impressed with the 'tude of this place, is to too much to ask in this day and age to not name every coffee drink served? I just want some caffeine and if baristas should know anything it is NOT to mess with people who need coffee! So he goes on making my drink and checks the tab, it turns out my 'off the menu' order saved me $1.50 apparently a premium for naming somthing a Macchiato.
Silver: Endurance IPA Jr., Founders Brewing Co., Grand Rapids, MI
Pink Cross Publishing, the same company that published a gay-friendly version of the Koran, stated that they were adding the finishing touches to the newly revised Bible. Mary and Joseph will be replaced by Mary and Josephine, a lesbian couple unable to have children the conventional way, hence the virgin birth of Jesus. All of Jesus’ disciples will be gay except for Judas. In the new Bible, all of the disciples will pair off after the Last Supper with the exception of Judas. Satan will also be straight. The new gay-friendly Bible has yet to be named.
(199 words)
The first time I was offered french cheese, a clothespin shot to the top of my wish list. This shit stinks. BAD. Blue cheese, Camembert, you name it... it's the mayor of smelldom.
* several books she's reading
“Ok sweetie, I will. Moo Goo Gai Pan, Twice Cooked Pork and Steamed Dumplings. All your favorites See you later.” With that Minerva was off. She slipped into her sleek Mercedes SL and shot out of the garage.
Yoh, so there’s less than 50 days to go to the rally… Time is running out fast, but some of our best (and worst) work has been done under pressure, so watch this space. We have some new sponsors on board who have been unstinting in their support of Team Boombaklot, so please show them some love and check them out here.
She’s given you the shanks
The next day we heard shouting from the field which we think was the farmer cajoling the horses into transport for market. We never saw them again.
We hired three guys to help us in the move at a cost of $85/hour. I had used this company before and they were legit, so I booked them again. Between those three guys, and The Husband I was pretty much in the way. Like any smart woman, I took that opportunity to go shopping. We needed mirrors for the bathrooms, curtain rods throughout the house (I had brushed nickel, but they need to be oil rubbed bronze in this house), a ladder, a steam mop and 2'' faux wood blinds for 12 windows.
I am really excited to share what I have learned with patina application and the feedback I have gotten from friends who tested the tutorial has been phenomenal!
Satan seeks our failure and prays for it. In Job, we have the record of such a prayer:
Mix all ingredients, except the pitas/chips/bread/etc...., in a food processor. I drain some, not all, of the liquid from the canned beans, if I'm using beans prepared in my own kitchen I add a little water to them when I blend it together. The end product should be thicker than chocolate syrup but thinner than peanut butter.
before we began even to build the moon, before we even began to make the brick, we would build two gigantic fly-wheels, the diameter of each should be ever so great, the circumference heavy beyond all precedent, and thundering strong, so that no temptation might burst it. They should revolve, their edges nearly touching, in opposite directions, for years, if it were necessary, to accumulate power, driven by some waterfall now wasted to the world. One should be a little heavier than the other. When the Brick Moon was finished, and all was ready, IT should be gently rolled down a gigantic groove provided for it, till it lighted on the edge of both wheels at the same instant. Of course it would not rest there, not the ten-thousandth part of a second. It would be snapped upward, as a drop of water from a grindstone. Upward and upward; but the heavier wheel would have deflected it a little from the vertical. Upward and northward it would rise, therefore, till it had passed the axis of the world. It would, of course, feel the world's attraction all the time, which would bend its flight gently, but still it would leave the world more and more behind. Upward still, but now southward, till it had traversed more than one hundred and eighty degrees of a circle. Little resistance, indeed, after it had cleared the forty or fifty miles of visible atmosphere. "Now let it fall," said Q., inspired with the vision. "Let it fall, and the sooner the better! The curve it is now on will forever clear the world; and over the meridian of that lonely waterfall,—if only we have rightly adjusted the gigantic flies,—will forever revolve, in its obedient orbit, the—BRICK MOON, the blessing of all seamen,—as constant in all change as its older sister has been fickle.”
me. If I had not been blaming and judging, I would have been done w/
“If my people, who are called by my name, will humble themselves and pray and seek my face and turn from their wicked ways, then I will hear from heaven and will forgive their sin and heal their land.” 2 Chronicles 7:14
THEN, and only then, are you allowed to decide whether you're still upset about the tweaks or not.
Felicita is caught behind a powerful brother who rules her life and that of her mother. In Pelimburg, the patriarchy is strict and unchallenged, and Felicita faces an unhappy arranged marriage with few rights. Determined to take control of her own life, she flees to the streets and falls in with a group of poor workers who sometimes also fight against the elite under the charismatic boy-in-charge, Dash.
If a bully is following or threatening your child in a situation where she or he cannot just leave, your child needs to be able to set a clear boundary.
In today’s electronic society it is not beyond the realms of incongruity to say millions of Kindle E Readers were probably given as presents to loved ones this Christmas, what did surprise the Big Dollop however was an article in various American Media outlets which reported that in the seven days prior to Christmas over 1,534,414 background reports were filed with the FBI in relation to the sale of firearms.
Ness says on the cover that the book was “inspired by an idea from Siobhan Dowd,” the celebrated author of BOG CHILD and THE LONDON EYE MYSTERY, among others. Dowd had just started this book when she died of breast cancer in 2007. “I felt—and feel—as if I’ve been handed a baton,” Ness wrote in his preface, “like a particularly fine writer has given me her story and said, ‘Go. Run with it. Make trouble.’”
So make plans today to shine brightly in our dark world.
18. Ask (Smiths)
Of course she was helpless
Through Facebook newsfeed. Just click the like button below. Through RSS Feed.
The bill will not move forward as the House has decided not to deal the possible backlash (which, given the Right to Work stuff they had to deal with, I think they just want to get done with the session and go home) and questionable constitutionality. A larger question looms though. Are we focused too much on “what” our children are taught rather than “how” they are taught it? I worry that we will become a nation that can recite anything but fails to imagine. As we continue to try to gauge success by tests and we may lessen our ability to think critically. Shouldn’t we expose our children to new ideas and new topics? Shouldn’t we teach them to question? I am not saying that this particular matter (evolution vs or + creation) is the model by which to do so, only that we need to remember the jobs of those within our educational system is not to teach students what to think, only how to think…or to be more specific “the many different ways as to how one could think about what one is thinking about”.
Then we moved on to have lunch where we talked with the students even more. It was a great opportunity to learn new things and share things with each other that we did not know before. After lunch we traveled to the university’s greenhouses where we looked at their different growing systems. They grew several beautiful exotic plants, as well as vegetables, and papaya trees, which were really cool. They also had a really nice hydroponics system in one of the greenhouses; hydroponics is a way to grow plants without soil- just a nutrient solution.
called, and drawn me from above,
And let's not forget Etsy/homemade items as well! There are so many amazing vendors out there, I wish I could list them all, but for now I will just share my friend Kelli's primitive decor online store:
Further, maintaining the exclamation point from the original text: "The modular nature of the Speleo System makes it possible to create any cave type and can be modified in minutes by simply unbolting and rotating a section! This means you can have hundreds of possible caving challenges and configurations for the price of one."
I have no map,
Mary’s health remained so poor following Isabella’s death that the Florentines and the French began quietly preparing to offer James new marriage candidates, should Mary die. She recovered sufficiently to become pregnant again in 1687, which worried the country’s Protestants, who feared a Catholic heir to the throne. When Mary gave birth to a son, James Francis Edward, the Protestants started spreading rumors that he wasn’t the king’s child at all, but the infant of a commoner smuggled into the birthing chamber in a warming pan. They ignored the fact that there were 200 witnesses to the birth, both Protestants and Catholics. Nonetheless, the Protestants decided they were through with their Catholic king and invited William of Orange, the husband of James’s daughter Mary, to invade England. The resulting Glorious Revolution saw James deposed and sent him, Mary, and their young son fleeing to France, where they stayed as guests of King Louis XIV.
Apples with caramel dip for a fun seasonal treat.
-Trying to get a nursery ready. It has been acting as a play room and catch all.
It's mid morning of day 7 and I seriously couldn't feel any better! Super huge bonus...I slept last night! 10:30 - 4!!! That's 5 & a half hours! I know to those that can get 8 or more hours a sleep a night it sounds like nothing but for the last little over 4 years I average 2 or 3 hours sleep. That's a big difference!
The agents were trying to establish close personal and business relations with the local population prior to the president’s visit. It was not the agents’ fault that the prostitutes were the only segment of local population readily available at 2 a.m.
I'm 5'2", BTW, so it probably comes up to you normally-sized people's waists.
Performance and Opening Reception:7-10P
I'm really sorry that you and X are struggling. I can almost, about 99%, assure you that X doesn't read anything I post on FB. He goes there to chat with Chamille or Aly, usually. He also very rarely uses FB, not even at our house. I'm also not his only friend who posts things about school and educational reform. Last I checked, we had 30 mutual friends and 25 of them are other homeschooling ones.
Joey: Hey! Who was up from 2 o'clock this morning until 5 o'clock this morning trying to get her back to sleep?
The festival will feature the NEW MUSE ensemble and special guests including dancer Janelle Bentley (Ephemeral Art), spoken word artist Gabriel De Los Reyes (UW-Madison First Wave Program), and piano/percussion duo Sole Nero (UW-Madison faculty Jessica Johnson and Anthony Di Sanza).
Coops x
The fact is, more often, authors are concluding there is no real upside beyond brick and mortar distribution clout, and decide that they can go it alone using an author solution services to self-publish their book and their own social network to reach their clients. The upside to traditional publishing is becoming less and less. Already, publishers use agents not just as their gatekeepers, but more, because publishers are unwilling to sift through piles of manuscripts to find that jem of a book. The modern professional agent feels it necessary to ensure a manuscript is ‘as near as published quality’ reducing the potential rejection, re-writes and heavy editing required, say twenty or more years ago. It is easy to forget that not so long ago we did not have word processors with grammar and spell checks and formatting at the push of a button. The job and pre publication requirements are far less now than they have been in the past and aging editors wearing wire-rimmed spectacles leaned awkwardly over hundreds of pages of hand written manuscripts.
Payton is a nervous kid. The doctor was fantastic. He explained exactly what he was doing before he did it but didn't let Payt watch. He said I could but we know that is not a good idea. Lucky for me Jared came along and blood- no matter whose- is awesome to him. I think if the doc would have allowed it Jared would have taken the scissors and knife and cut him open himself. No kidding he did it to Tyler (another long story).
Write a character sketch or two. You need them anyway, and they’re great warm-ups for Chapter One. Ask yourself: What will this character be doing when we first meet him? Write it. Again, you might find yourself writing Chapter One.
Atheist: I would like you to take a look at the fossil record.
She pulled on a mask and scrub cap and called in her team of nurses and resident doctors. (The doctor who delivered us was a-maz-ing; she was tall and athletic and had the can-do spirit of someone who would climb Everest.)
11:30am-5:30pm
The power of Andrei Tarkovsky’s Solaris is not in its futuristic sets, or in the hypnotic shots of the alien planet’s weird, fluid surface, but it’s in the way he juxtaposes his alien, futuristic elements against the intimately familiar. This is a future not just of flashing lights and video screens, but of wood and wool and leather, of dogs and horses, books and photographs. In Frost & Bjarnason’s SÓLARIS we do find the futuristic, gaseous atmospheres and pulses one might expect from a sci-fi soundtrack. Yet here they are carved instead from the warm, fragile sonorities of a string orchestra -Poland’s Sinfonietta Cracovia- a gently prepared piano whose harmonies warp and melt before transforming again—and waves upon waves of guitar.
Jenny, you have been my heartbeat for the last 16 years of my life. I knew from the first moment I saw you that you were the one who would change my life forever. I don't know how I knew, but I knew. Whether it was something in your eyes, or something in your smile, or somethng in your soul, I don't know, and it doesn't matter. What matters is that you saw it too, and that here we are, 16 years later, raising three amazing children together and sharing a life I never dreamed possible. You've been there to share my greatest joys and my deepest sorrows, and you've always been my light in the darkest of times. I need you more than you'll ever know, and I love you more than words could ever express.
Therefore the five kings of the Amorites, the king of Jerusalem, the king of Hebron, the king of Jarmuth, the king of Lachish, and the king of Eglon, gathered together and went up, they and all their armies, and camped before Gibeon and made war against it.
Let’s start with the spells for this deck and save the creature interaction for later.
A man was bedridden, in a nursing home. He had no visitors, but one man who would come. He would ask him to describe what he saw out the window. The man would tell him all about the little children playing tag. Jumping rope and kids games. The people strolling by and the beautiful trees and flowers. Birds singing and the wonderful sunsets.
Hol
That last one was the one I had trouble with.
The magazine in the giveaway is the one I bought.
You may have noticed from the Pablo Records label on the cassette that the recording is not in stereo, but in mono. What a blast from the distant past that is. A mono album. The plastic casing is quite an unusual colour – a sort of beige, which I’m not really sure was quite as dark and yellowy as this originally. Maybe the plastic’s aged over the years. I can’t really remember how the tape looked when my Mom first bought it. Sadly, I don’t know what’s happened to the original case either. But what a great example of a mid 1970s pre-recorded audio cassette this is.
The remedial and deterrent purposes of multiplied damages, and their measure for a particular case, are best established by the district court in light of the original purposes of 35 U.S.C. '284, as set forth in Judge Gajarsa's concurring opinion. The fundamental issue remains the reasonableness, or in turn the culpability, of commercial behavior that violates legally protected property rights.
To Vietnam with Love: A Travel Guide for the Connoisseur
♥ fuzzy socks
Where have You hidden Yourself,
Cardigans Rise and shine S
He died so we might have life — living in the Son. “Those who are Christ’s have crucified their flesh” (Gal. 5). We must obey. Obedience isn’t an option, because Christianity is about right relationships, not whether we fit into a formula, the demonic spins designed to distract us from what really is important.
Have a great weekend y’all!
Shooter, Jim and Michael Zeck Marvel Super Heroes: Secret Wars May, 1984. Marvel Comics.
I padded barefoot across the wooden floorboards in the dark, round to the bathroom, and through the doorway onto the cool tiles, closing the door behind me. As usual I didn't bother to flick the light switch just outside the door: the small halogen light Rachel fixed to the cistern for nighttime toilet trips like this would be enough, and anyway I'd be sitting down; less chance of a stray splash that way.
It's probably no surprise to anyone here that I'm a big fan of James Bond (even if he is a bit problematic -- especially in the much-beloved Connery films).
And what will NAMA do with all this cash when Bank of Ireland does reimburse it? According to an interview with Bloomberg’s Neil Callanan this week, NAMA “will repay more than 3 billion euros of bonds this year”. What bonds are these? These are the pieces of paper that NAMA gave to the banks in 2010 and 2011 in return for the €74bn of loans it was acquiring. The bonds amount to €32bn in total, of which €1.25bn exactly have been repaid to date. NAMA must pay the bondholders – the banks from whom it acquired the loans a rate of interest equal to the 6-month Euribor rate, currently about 1.25% per annum. NAMA is required to redeem the bonds by latest 2020. To do so earlier is a matter of discretion for NAMA.
(Still, the more the merrier, in my book!)
MORGANTOWN, WV – May 2, 2012 – (Motor Sports Newswire) – MX Sports Pro Racing and Alli Sports, a division of the NBC Sports, have announced that FMF Racing has partnered with the Lucas Oil Pro Motocross Championship, sanctioned by AMA Pro Racing, becoming the Official Exhaust of the 2012 season.
tracks 7-9
Recently, I have been attracted to salads and relishes. I think I find the ease and variety appealing. In the spirit of sharing, I offer the following recipe. Perhaps, I will add a few more in the weeks ahead.
There should be no lumps...
I discovered afterwards that there is a Mediaeval Baebes musical all tee'd up and ready to go, which has been put together by a German actor called Micha Bergese, who is probably most famous for playing the dashing werewolf (below, right) in A Company of Wolves.
“I commit myself to speak out and to publish and reveal in every way possible all the ways that the brainwashing and mind-control work till all wake up to the fact that all have denied life and have fallen in the trap of the money god that use rules and forgiveness that do not support life, but only support those that love the money god.” Bernard Poolman
“Timelines, blokey,” Casbokt reminded me, “and besides, those are clones who become President. I am not so sure this Soetoro is what he says he was anyway.”
I have begun the homework on researching/reading all I can on twin pregnancies and parenting twins and found some very common sense/helpful advice. I know we're going to do fine and I'm praying they will be good babies like Kyleigh.
Home!
There is a very different feeling to this journey than to the one at the beginning of our trip westward. There were so many unknowns at the beginning, and with them, accompanying anxieties. My biggest fear was about Skye’s safety. That fear was intensified when one of my contemporaries told me about setting out to cycle across the country many years ago, only to have his plans curtailed by a car with a trailer that fishtailed, and landed him in the hospital, fortunate to be alive. Now, there is not only the relief that Skye is alive and well, but I feel such a sense of pride in Skye’s accomplishment, and I am moved by his passion, dedication and self-discipline. Cycling across the country is a feat for anyone who does it. Add to that, actively participating in approximately 25 events, sticking to a rigorous schedule because of those events, blogging mostly on a daily basis—often when he was dog tired—and talking to the media countless times; this was an extraordinarily challenging journey. The weather—particularly the wind and the rain—was often more of a fierce opponent than a friendly companion. Skye did it all, day after day, and I could tell from the responses he got from one Cool Communicator after another, as we traveled across Canada, that Skye’s journey sent an implicit message to everyone who speaks in different ways, not only that , “You deserve to communicate,” but that, “You deserve to be treated in the same way anyone else is treated, you deserve to participate, you deserve to be respected and valued”, and “You are important.”
2-3 carrots, shredded
Dear Heartbroken Person:
The sale hammered out before the big win, will free Gerald from his father's debts but won’t close until the horse passes the breed inspection. However, Her Majesty's Secretary just presented Gerald with a better deal, not to mention the prestige of being able to claim the Queen as a customer. Completing the sale with the American is the only honorable choice, but Gerald isn't sure how one says, "No, Your Majesty; you can't have the horse."
I love the cards and listed them in my Etsy store to see if they sell. If not they have a good home with me and might get mailed out to family and friends. I might have to hand deliver rather than mail as most of them will require extra postage since the embellishments are so thick.
Wit and Charm met at a party thrown by a man named Sleepy. Sleepy was chattering on and on about things of no interest, pausing only to yawn for no reason. Wit smiled at Charm, who stood politely and listened, seeing no way to escape from the conversation. Her glow and graceful warmth pulled Wit in immediately, who could not escape her pull.
i wish you all a HAPPY, PROSPEROUS, CREATIVE, HEALTHY and BLESSED NEW YEAR!!!!
Respect to El Goog,Taro Nombei,Hoochie Coochie, Wara Katsu ,Simon 666 ,Vesper ,Doyle C and especially the gone but not forgotten Jazz Nekko for stoking and keeping the Japanese Jazz fires burning...
This is an indication of the bad politics of this man. He interfered in something that was done through elections and voting. It is inconceivable that Qatar can buy all these countries’ votes, while the US cannot. This demonstrates that America wants to have a monopoly on everything.
The beautiful prelude to ostracod action is the dance of the female marine worms who rise to the water’s surface spraying out their eggs in a mass of green light attracting hundreds of males who rush over to fertilise them, the water fizzes with action, it's like watching hundreds of tiny catherine wheels going off all over the water.
Never ever give Neem to a child!
In a soup pot or Dutch oven, warm a little olive oil over medium high heat. Add the ham, and cook, turning once, until golden brown on both sides. Add the leek and carrot, and cook, stirring occasionally, until tender but not browned, about 10 minutes. (If the pan seems dry when you add the vegetables, add oil as needed.) Add the split peas and 8 cups of water. Bring to a boil; then reduce the heat and simmer gently, stirring regularly to prevent scorching, for 90 minutes to 2 hours, or until the peas have completely broken down and the soup has a creamy texture. This amount of water makes for a fairly thick soup; if you like yours thinner, add more water until it reaches your desired texture. The slice of ham should break apart as it cooks, but if necessary, use a couple of forks to tear it into smaller pieces. Taste the soup, and salt as needed. If the flavor is a little dull, add a splash or two of apple cider vinegar; you shouldn’t taste the vinegar in the soup, but it should subtly wake up the flavor.
-Cena rolls into the ring with his chain but Brock takes it away and throws it out.
I have Ledum Homeopathy (puncture wounds) -Anrica and Rescue remedy. I gave them all to her in some oats. I "TTouched her" then Nolvasan scrubbed the hoof thoroughly, before an Epsom salt soak for her Hoof that was injured. The good thing was, it bled SO MUCH...if anyting was in there, it got fluched on out. It did appear to be a very clean cut. But boy, what a bruise...she would not let me touch it hardly!
That pretty little bird came from Etsy...click here. I added some spun sugar distress ink around the edges. The flowers, gems, doily and cheesecloth are from Michaels. I cut the heart from a Prima leaf using a Spellbinders die. I added glitter to the edges.
And a convocation of eagles.
Tree
It's always so exciting to stand at the beginning of something new! Anything new in your lives that you're excited about right now? :)
Friday 17 June
Mile 2 9:03
LOPEZ: Hola, Wolf.
5. At A Later Date (Live at the Electric Circus, Manchester, 2 October 1977)
The judge came in and the proceedings began. One side spoke and then the other. Her therapist gave her a glowing recommendation. This wasn’t a custody hearing as they lived together with the children fairly happily through the rest of the year. This had to do with the past. A past from before they were married. From before she was old enough to read or go to school. But it would not go away. The court system wouldn’t let it. So they were back again this year also. Each year it was discussed and gone over until someone always said that it shouldn’t have come this far in the first place, but that never changed a thing.
A reminder to members of the Academic Challenge team- field trip forms for Friday’s trip are due tomorrow!
Nelson Shields IV
The glories of my God and King
Last year during Floatopia, I was bright orange. By accident, I had dyed my skin that morning at a Hindu festival and that afternoon, walking through Isla Vista was more surreal than usual. Looks of bikini-clad distress greeted me from every direction.
On to my thoughts about bios!
I told him my brother-in-law was no longer working for me, but that I’d look into it and get back to him. He thanked me and left. I was freaking out! I immediately called my brother-in-law, had a major blowout on the phone, told him he needed to give this man his money back and remedy the problem he’d caused. He said he’d already spent that money paying bills and didn’t have it to return. My brother-in-law told me I should refund the man his money, he also made a comment that I had money as I’d been able to pay for my new deck at home. I yelled some obscenity at him I’m sure and hung up.
Vivo offers family-style dining meaning all the plates are meant to be shared. One dish from the antipasti selection will feed two for sure, or four if you want to really stretch it. To follow the antipasti, diners are encouraged to select a dish from the primi selection. By dining this way, a pasta or risotto dish is enough to satisfy four and the secondi (entrees) can be shared by two.
Writers: Wilson Collison (play), John Lee Mahin
Today’s challenge is celebrity hair you love. I don’t even know where I could begin with this because I love various celebrities for different reasons so I suppose this post is going to become more of a hairspiration post – so bare with me.
Here's what is on my wish list:
Ashamed of their vulnerability? Possibly.
Two of my good friends, Annie and Staci, were in NYC at the same time, so when i had free time, it was wonderful to have them to sightsee with!
Details: Here you will develop your antagonist. This can be a villain or just a rival. It’s up to you. Just create a character to oppose your protagonist.
In the scheme of things, I haven’t been to many black belt retreats at all… Only 3 in total, 4 including the one that I plan on attending this year. Even so, I rarely took the time to think back to my first retreat experience in 8th grade. Now that I’ve been asked to recollect these memories, so many of them are rushing back to me. The floodgates seem to be opening. There are quite a few experiences that highlighted my first retreat…
A scale is a series of notes that go in an ascending and descending manner. For every scale that is minor or major there are 7 notes, for example in the key of C the notes are C - D - E - F - G - A - B. and the 8th note (in this example will be C) goes back to the root note but an octave higher. (the 12th fret on a guitar).
Follow Earl Ofari Hutchinson on thehutchinsonreportnews.com And on Twitter www.twitter.com/earlhutchinson
Among other findings, the report said- the court had no adequate in house management of $12.8 million in revenue and no written policies or procedures on court operations. It has also ignored civil service requirements in hiring. Traffic Court judges incorrectly used judicial expense funds to buy disability insurance for themselves and to pay replacement judges. A similar use of the judicial expense fund at Criminal District Court has prompted a state investigation.
From my dad, I learned integrity, hard work, dependability, professionalism, and the incredible ability to switch from friendly and engaging to hard-core business in the snap of your fingers. I also learned that boys never hit girls, but they always defend their sisters. This became quite a dilemma when the neighbourhood bully turned out to be the girl across the street and my next younger sister turned out to be physically and athletically more gifted than me.
Due to the poor light, and lack of opportunity, we took no photos until the next morning, and even then we didn’t take many.
We haven't made a raw pizza in ages, but it turned out really well...
See what I mean when I say that the constitution is not worth the paper it is written on? According to that piece of toilet paper they can legally take away everything you own whenever they feel like it.
I can't make a huge overhaul all at one time and this isn't something I can do perfectly. I'm not able to grow all my own plant foods and I'm not about to start raising chickens or beef cattle. I'm also not ready to commit my meat buying to local farmers due to the expense- but it is a goal of mine by the time the Farmer's Market season rolls around. I do rely on some conveniences simply because it's the culture I live in.
How I Met Your Mother – Best sitcom on television. Don’t believe me, well then obviously you haven’t watched enough How I Met Your Mother. I don’t hold it against you; just know that me and everybody else who have been watching are enjoying one of the funniest shows in years while you’re still clinging to your Becker box set.
Yet this is how many people approach the lifestyle change of healthy eating. They say, "No more fast food for me, I'm going to do it this time!" or "No more carbs, no more sugar: that's what Jessica Alba did for bikini season!" And does it ever work? Really?
I just etched a large batch of copper, including many yet to be seen pieces!
First, somebody, somewhere, made the determination that the juice was worth the squeeze sending these things in on the bin Laden raid. In an op like this, with the amount of planning time available, it wasn't like these guys were casting about looking for any ol' ride into the LZ that they could find. This was thought out, strategized and war gamed into the ground, and at least ONE operational consideration had to be the loss of a helo and its very existence being compromised. In the end, the size of the prize was deemed worth the risk... and I happen to agree with that assessment, whoever made it.
Paisley based community drumming group The Buddy Beat has won a national voluntary art award. They have been announced as the winners of The Scottish Epic Awards 2011 for their inspiring film “Keep the Beat…Our Journey in Rhythm.”
Dear Friends
I want more than safety. I want more than to be comfortable, and I think the people around me do too. I want justice.
They spent their lunch together in the Park, a beautiful area, full of greenery and flowers. A large number of people were eating there, sitting in the grass or on nearby benches, making small-talk over the sounds of birds. Laughter and music filtered out from the door of a pub across the way. Bees buzzed around as they ate their sausages on the grass, dripping with grease and generally making a mess of things, such as dresses and dolls who got in the drip line.
Kids clothes are currently in the wash so here is what we are having this week!
I had lots of positive feedback when I told people my ideas for the shop. They were pleased it wasnt going to be another hairdressers or takeaway! Alot of people thought thats what it was going to be - a chinese, beacause ive got a hatch in the wall! It divides the shop from the working studio spaces and will provide a window for people to watch me working and for me to see out into the gallery/shop, see whats going on.
The blog is dark until May, except for Fridays, so I shall see you next Friday for the next roundup of prompts. Yes, I do miss you all, but, boy am I getting things done!
43 The next day Jesus decided to go to Galilee. And he found Philip and said to him, “Follow me.” 44 Now Philip was from Beth-sa’ida, the city of Andrew and Peter. 45 Philip found Nathan’a-el, and said to him, “We have found him of whom Moses in the law and also the prophets wrote, Jesus of Nazareth, the son of Joseph.” 46 Nathan’a-el said to him, “Can anything good come out of Nazareth?” Philip said to him, “Come and see.” 47 Jesus saw Nathan’a-el coming to him, and said of him, “Behold, an Israelite indeed, in whom is no guile!” 48 Nathan’a-el said to him, “How do you know me?” Jesus answered him, “Before Philip called you, when you were under the fig tree, I saw you.” 49 Nathan’a-el answered him, “Rabbi, you are the Son of God! You are the King of Israel!” 50 Jesus answered him, “Because I said to you, I saw you under the fig tree, do you believe? You shall see greater things than these.” 51 And he said to him, “Truly, truly, I say to you, you will see heaven opened, and the angels of God ascending and descending upon the Son of man.”
A skilled orator fond of glamorous clothes, high heels and make-up, Fernandez still wears black as she mourns her husband and closest advisor, former President Nestor Kirchner, who died late last year.
with the next hundred chores
and she knows
I never have any regular tests done, with the exception of ones for MS, and that's only because of job.
and one step closer
In the introduction to the report (p. 8) ABM outlines the role of indicators:
Three years ago, I was inspired to take action against this reality when I met Sandhya. She ran a non-profit, Vijay Foundation Trust (VFT), and an orphanage in my mother’s hometown, a small town called Kadapa in Andhra Pradesh, India. Upon finding a severely beaten woman left for dead in a field near her home, Sandhya began to take in destitute women and train them in textile arts. I saw the immense potential in combining my design skills with the women’s tailoring skills to both improve their lives and create a successful business.
‘‘(7) PROTECTED ENTITY.—The term ‘protected entity’ means an entity, other than an individual, that contracts with a cybersecurity provider for goods or services to be used for cybersecurity purposes.
After all the swirls were cut away I stuck the rest of the template to the top of the cheese box. (I also used the cut away pieces to make the other half of the cheese box into a wreath.)
It has come to that point in my writing that I am ready to send my work out into the world. Revisions are done and now I need to see if I can get representation.
Black Friday and Cyber Monday can be some of the best times to buy tech items such as laptops at really low bargain prices. But just how do you go about finding those jaw-dropping special online discounts and sales…
The Houston Chronicle reported in December, "Each month, an average of 2,286 state parole violators are housed in Texas jails, a policy costing taxpayers at least $42 million a year. Harris County has the largest tab — estimated at $7.6 million." I'll guarantee that if parolees on blue warrants are each in jail an average of 13 additional days, you'll soon hear counties wailing like scalded cats when they realize the implications.
CIA/Russian KGB man Oswald did not shoot
I could tell you of how receiving messages from people so terrorised they wanted to tell us their lives were no longer worth living became routine. Of sleepless nights fearing that the person had gone ahead with their plans, or even of the devastating night when despite the online community rapidly rallying help we heard that the prompt police response was too late and another person was found dead.
In effect, it was a room in which "man's talk", replete with the most colourful swearing, could be enjoyed.
Since I don’t have a whole lot of free time, I’ve started using the thirty-minute metro/bus ride in the mornings and evenings to do some writing. Not real substantial writing, but the scribbling, stream-of-consciousness, just getting the words moving kind. I really hate that kind of writing, and I especially hate doing it in public. The only thing worse than forcing yourself to encapsulate even the most mundane thoughts in writing is having other people see you do it.
V.J. Beachem (2013) – New Haven High School (IN) – V.J. Beachem has committed to play at Notre Dame in the 2013-2014 season and will bring a variety of skills to the table for the Fighting Irish. Some consider him to be short for a Big East small forward at 6’6, but his length and shooting range make up for that. ESPN has him listed as a three star recruit.
I know that many people out there are driven by revenge. And I know that adhering to the rule of law and its principles have proved to be a challenge in the case of extremely heinous crimes as killing children at Utoya or kill 3000 people in New York.
1916
Or you might have to stand and wait 15 minutes while the dessert guy finishes chatting with the maintenance guy (probably about when they are going to go smoke pot later in the night.)
Hong Kong Mercantile Exchange Starts Gold Futures Trading. Silver Futures Soon! Alfred Adask: “The Big Legal Secret, The Government Thinks We Are Animals”! Brother Nathanael: AIPAC’S Prelude To Treason 2011 ! David Duke: Wicked Witch Osama and Wizard Obama! Zionist Mass Murderers And War Lies! Ron Paul Questions Official Bin Laden Story: “I’ve Heard So Many Stories”! Jeff Clark: “Silver Price – The Least You Should Worry About”! World on Course For Next Crisis, Warns Freemason Gordon Brown!
My husband loved this and he ate like 8 of them!! I didn't think that he would love them this much so I was pretty happy with the result.
Even then, he was thrilled to board the vessel being assured of God that he would be able to witness His saving grace in Rome. Of course the Lord didn’t promise an event free trip but Paul rested in the hope that God was in full control of the situation.
And went to work again.
Simon Armitage introduces his favourite film White Silence, made in 1924 about Scott's trip to Antarctica (Picturedrome, 7.30pm)
Dimma is the brainchild of brothers Ingo & Silli Geirdal who founded the band in 2004 from the ruins of their old band Stripshow. Stripshow released their first and only album in 1996; a rock-opera called Late-Nite Cult Show which was later released in Japan and South Korea and subsequently banned by the Korean government for its anti-social lyrics and image. This achievement brought the band a certain infamy which reached the ears of original Alice Cooper bandmembers Dennis Dunaway, Neal Smith & Michael Bruce who invited the Geirdal brothers to play with them at various concerts and events across the USA. This lead to Ingo & Silli producing and playing with Michael Bruce on two albums which were distributed internationally. This in turn lead Ingo to joining acknowledged hip-hop metal masters Quarashi for their U.S. and Japanese tours of 2004 and playing on their new album Guerilla Disco released by Sony in Japan 2005. Having laid down some bed tracks in the studio with drummer Bjarki Magnusson (Stripshow) the brothers invited their drinking buddy Hjalti Omar (Brain Police & Urmull) to sing along with them in the studio and upon hearing the results it was clear that a rock monster had been created -and its name was DIMMA! The Icelandic band name was inspired by the bands heavy rock music which is at times dark, exotic and draws some inspiration from old Icelandic folk music.
Gazans, Palestinians, are neither your brothers, nor terrorists. They are ordinary human beings who have lived under the occupation of Israelis for three generations.
You could fit all of the physical descriptions of Elizabeth Bennett or Netherfield or even Mr. Darcy on a single page (or less), but yet these characters and places have come alive in the minds of her readers.
11. Deliver Your Children
A friend lent me the book, tis by David Gillespie a once fat, Australian Lawyer (who is still the latter I think) anyway he was quite keen on sugar. I quite like sugar too, especially maple syrup and quite revoltingly I love snickers bars... anyway tis no more, sugar is not good for me.
In the fifties, following a passion he already had when young, Toselli began creatively decorating the facade of his house, producing geometric patterns in various brightful colours. It is possible the interior has been decorated too, but I did not come along credible reports about this.
Orlande de Lassus Benedic anima mea
Now, Nicole’s newest CD release, The Very Thought of You reached #7 on the U.S. Billboard Jazz Chart. This romantic CD features love songs, originals and gems from the great American Songbook. It was produced by music veteran Hal Batt (Regina Belle, Jean Carne, Julio Iglesias) with an assist from Executive Creative Producer Don Mizell (co-producer of Ray Charles’ Genius Loves company). Jazz Improv writes, “…beautiful, emotionally evocative…a terrific voice and a sensitive way with a lyric.” It’s with that same sensitivity and genuine, heartfelt delivery that Nicole Henry mesmerizes audiences wherever she goes. Nicole Henry’s voice is uplifting and captivating. She proves she is one of the finest vocalists to emerge this decade and ready to be discovered by wider audiences everywhere.
The other thing I learned from all this much put off DIY business is that... I'm not very good at DIY. Check back in a few years to see what I do next.
If I can accept myself, then rejection by others will not hurt me.
Ear, but earn and wear and tear
I might have told you before that I am really not the cook in the house. I mostly view cooking as a chore, and not as a creative outlet or as pleasant in any way. I get stressed out in the kitchen.
LOVE these
In fast growing economy like India, corruption has swept in all social sectors where moral conduct and character, and ethics have no meaning and hence, the social values are eroded….Therefore, to talk about the gandhian principles and the way of life is regarded as out-dated fashion.
Pottery Barn had sent me a $25 off $50 coupon, so I ordered three different sets of handles, but decided these ones tied in best with her room. They give the straight lined dresser a little bit more of a feminine feel and tie in nicely with her crib.
*”The work is $10. The lie is extra.”
Most of the party opted to stay for a few more beers at the pub. but my friend John and I left just after 3pm as we had an awkward train journey to make. For differing health reasons neither of us are drinking particularly large amounts of beer at present, so it made double sense to leave when we did. As luck would have it we arrived back in West Malling town with plenty of time to spare, so nipped into a local coffee shop for a welcome cup of tea, before catching the first of three trains that would see us home.
- Adam Levine's character in American Horror Story will be part of a duo called The Lovers and it's a sexual role. It will be set in a criminal asylum.
Still no care worker. And I don’t even know how that’s going to turn out, for better or for worse.
I mentioned Craig Lutz earlier as the Lewisville Marcus Sophomore has established himself as the favorite for the TX 5-A Title. After a very impressive Frosh season, he has gone undefeated turning back many of the state's best in the process. Don't count out CJ Brown (Southlake Carroll) quite yet but he has not had the season many expected.
I haven’t converted to those paid websites (….yet. And I don’t plan on it); I’m sticking to the free ones, but of course the free ones are where all of the weirdos seem to hang out.
The hoops are rather large but not heavy at all! The bracelets are very comfy as well! The earrings were $7 a piece and the bracelets were $5 a piece!
So do I take a page out off our fluffy friends book or brave the outdoors with numerous layers and a 5$ note handy for that hot chocolate with extra marshmallows? I like winter. I like winter when I’m sitting in bed all snuggled in my PJs with a hot chocolate in hand watching rubbish tele – my idea of hibernating! Or when I’m rugged up with a wooly hat and coat, ugs on foot and a scarf wrapped up to my nose going for a walk on one of those days where the air is fresh and winter is evident. But when there’s not a cloud in they sky. I don’t feel like those are days we will get a lot this winter. Im thinking more raincoat on, struggling against the wind to walk up the hill to uni then rolling back down the hill. Then looking at out reflection in the mirror and realizing we looked like that ALL day! But I’m being optimistic. I didn’t get snow in England so maybe winter in NZ will prove to be the same as last year. Confusing us all by blessing us with snow. I want to build a snowman! How hard of a request is that? Seems that it’s not an easy one!
276While altars blaze, and angels tremble round.
I wasn't going to buy any more dishes. I said it but I didn't write it down. So.. and of course there was the One King's Lane episode in January. Lenox Holiday Tartan. Now, on to this pattern. I've been coveting loving it for a long time. A very long time. So fast forward to April. You can see by now that I forgot to ask God to strengthen my willpower, or lack thereof! Along comes my dear, beautiful, gracious, enabling friend Cherry Kay from the gorgeous Entertaining Women blog. The little tidbit of me wanting this lovely set of dishes didn't escape her meticulous attention to detail. My inbox was being peppered by deals I couldn't possibly pass up on ebay. What's a poor addicted soul to do? Are you feeling my pain?? In a very short time (since April 14 to be exact) I've collected 4 dinner plates, 8 salad plates and 12 bread and butters. aaah life is good. Thank you dear Cherry Kay, you've enabled me to make a dream come true.
So I've got this really sad plant in the kitchen. It's actually the second plant that's been in the pot, but it's just as sad as the first. I can't seem to keep plants alive. Except the neglected succulents, ironically, that I haven't touched in months:
Mr. Monty Santo: I am.
Black racist
1 Tablespoon sugar
So, I thought, right! I won't throw it away, I will put them with the roses.
Senate Minority Leader Mitch McConnell (R-Ky.) declared on June 19 that there wasn’t enough time to approve any of the plans to raise the government’s debt ceiling by the Aug. 2 deadline. He proposed a short-term hike to buy more time.
-Modest
“Certainly students are writing to demonstrate knowledge, skills, and application for their instructor; however, a key criterion for many instructors is rhetorical awareness, or how well the writing has been tailored for a specific or “target” audience. Put simply, a writer may effectively entertain, inform, and/or persuade one audience with a particular piece of writing, but that same piece of writing, when presented to a different audience, may fall flat.”
Th? end result i? and always will be how many fish it’s going to cat?h and how b?g. I know that I want to b? c?ming ?ff the lake showing the b?ys m? shopping trips were ?ell worth it.
Snuff, too, would fall into this category, but with some minor differences. First, because it is not so disgusting, it would not have the same negative connotations as “chew.” (Activities can be sub-rational without being bad.) Second, snuff taken through the nose would fall under a different category. Everything else we have seen involves the mouth, and this is only natural, for the mouth was made to receive things into itself. But to sniff something up one’s nose . . . this is unnatural.
Traditionally, an agent provocateur (plural: agents provocateurs, French for “inciting agent(s)”) is an agent employed by the police or other entity to act undercover to entice or provoke another person to commit an illegal act. More generally, the term may refer to a person or group that seeks to discredit or harm another by provoking them to commit a wrong or rash action.
getting maps together and researching locations of ruins.....
It’s Monday! What Are You Reading? is a weekly meme hosted by Book Journey. This is a great way to plan out your reading week and see what others are currently reading as well… you never know where that next “must read” book will come from!
At home, I hung up my dress, screwed the bulb in my daughter’s aquarium lid and watched her fish swim indifferently around in their dirty tank, their world now a much brighter shade of decay. I flipped the TV channels, pausing to watch a mother run to hug her small children, her edited happiness somehow coercing my tears– how good that must feel. I’ll take a happy feeling wherever I can get it, even a canned version. My life is full of dirty creature comforts, but my arms are well accustomed to a sterile kind of emptiness. A mother separated from her children is the cruelest kind of pain; a mother with no money to care for them is just as bad. A careless and cruel man well, he’s just par for the course. I’ve lived the former and grazed the latter, and my scarred up heart has a hair trigger response to the sound of a crying child, to a woman whose eyes tell you she is teetering at the end. I haunt the trenches where she is taking fire.
Well... I could not resist them either LOL
How did you spend Good Friday?
Longleat, by any measure, is an archeology project. Certainly I have nothing that could accurately be called a memory of it, having been one and not there. But grasping about for equivalencies proves oddly unsatisfying. It was a major convention in 1983, yes. In this regard, it was a known quantity. But analogy is terribly unhelpful here. To compare it to the 2012 “official convention” in Cardiff - an event I just escaped from a few hours ago at time of writing - is pointless. The Cardiff convention was a slickly professional affair and, more to the point, was executed by a BBC that had full mastery of the concept of fandom and its relationship with Doctor Who. Its slickness was in most regards cover for the real key fact, which is that it was an official convention in every sense of the word - a convention that actively promoted an official narrative of what the series was and how it was loved.
It’s sure to be a fun filled month and I look forward to seeing you all there !!
Settling in Chicago during the 1930s, Williamson played local clubs and recorded for RCA Victor in 1937. The miles and gigs had added up before Williamson made some of his finest sides in 1952-1953 for Art Sheridan's Chance Records (including the classic "Homesick" that gave him his enduring stage name).
i'll share my cadbury mini-eggs for cute hair.
Tomorrow I'll post the final build. We have to finish the trim, put on doors and build some shelving. Plus there's all my crap to lug and store in there. Come back, it'll be epic. I swear. There will probably be more pain and maybe even some bleeding.
So here is the pitch: You buy the file which has 10 cards on a page + personalize using Adobe Acrobat Reader + print on card stock or on Avery Business card pre-cut paper and voila! I thought you could also include a CD of the file in case the teacher wants to make more :)
The co-chair of Mr Fillon is notable also because those who are to construct the new Chernobyl sarcophagus are the French companies Bouygues and Vinci. Both are indeed class acts, as I know from first hand experience, and will no doubt do a very good job. That said, you cannot help but have one or two suspicions that Mr Fillon has an additional agenda.
Carrot Cupcakes and Chocolate Sour Cream Frosting
I'm going to try and start a new feature on Project Savior, who knows how well it will go.
It sure is swoon worthy isn't it?
If you are about to get into a political fight with your lover, then you are an idiot. If that person is giving you sex on a regular basis then let him or her do whatever the fudge they want with their recycled cans!! Let him or her explore their latest conspiracy theory in relation to 9-11 or the killing of JFK. You know what really happened because it’s blindingly feckin’ obvious. However, you’d also like to have an orgasm this week, so weigh the pros and cons and THINK before you speak. It’s simple, Silly.
Back to the Box. Mai Couture seems like it rings a bell – I don’t remember how prestigious this brand is. I don’t own anything from this brand, though. I received a full-sized 5 mL product, which retails for $28 CAD.
Whilst they are allowed to send it to the Secretary of State, the inquiry inspector will not look at it now that the inquiry is over.
Sylvia turned to Emily. “Nice dress,” she said.
This doesn’t happen too often for me– I’m hardened and patient enough with any country’s problems to stick it out for a while. But my last encounter a few years ago went something like this:
We are aware that some of our customers are currently experiencing problems with response time in EFS-Web. Resolving this problem is our highest priority. We understand that our continued success is based on your
Mandy from Biblical Homemaking is part of a Spring Cleaning Challenge. Just in time to inspire me to complete mine! Here are some of the posts that have inspired me from this link party. (Too bad I can't win the giveaway)
warm thoughts on cold nights,
That’s all I have time for now. Have a nice day.
thanks auntie jenny for the super cute notepads! birthday brunch with the bestie (weathervane). birthday pedis with the bestie. the big sis said i needed a new coffee cup for my birthday. all ready for the super bowl - go giants! how 4 year old girls watch the super bowl . . . at least until madonna comes on tv. big boy wrestles with jack. a birthday celebration -- so grateful for girlfriends (southern rail, carrboro). memory match during quiettime. lollipops with tay at nordstrom cafe. he is happiest when he is outside. my chick-fil-a lunch date. checking out the jugglers at the circus preshow (ringling brothers, raleigh). the tightrope walkers were her favorite part of the show. ring-around-the-rosie with katie and lucy.
SLOW COOKED MOROCCAN CHICKEN, APRICOT AND CHICKPEA TAGINE
In the early 80s, I had the pleasure of receiving a lovely red View-Master from my parents. It was one of those old school toys that I still can't believe I had. It's delightfully archaic in our smartphone world and yet the View-Master still thrives. For the uninitiated, a View-Master is a device for viewing 3-D images embedded on a paper disk. Every disk contains seven image sets. One simply inserts a disk into the viewer, clicks the handle and a new image is displayed. It's a camera/binocular/slide projector rolled into one handy, kid-friendly device.
The great thing was, I had a deadline - I had a coupon from the company I bought the digital scrapbook software (Creative Memories) but it expired June 30, so I was gunning to finish by then and use the coupon to print the book (made it, just barely!). Another great thing - I really had gotten a lot done over the past year, I had to only finish about half (and about half of the remaining pictures were edited - the Studly Hubby really stepped up for this). And the third great thing - I got really fast at it! After about 15 pages or so I finally got a nice quick rhythm and really mastered the software. Now I think I could whip out another book pretty easily - so hopefully I will! I plan to try to make one every year or so.
''And then there's the Barack Obama that lives with me in my house, and that guy's a little less impressive. For some reason this guy still can't manage to put the butter up when he makes toast, secure the bread so that it doesn't get stale, and his 5-year-old is still better at making the bed than he is.''
improvement would have been unobvious. Where the specification reflects embodiment examples which perform worse than the prior art comparisons, the EPO will often conclude that the claimed invention does not solve the problem over the breadth of the claim, and the claim is therefore at least partly not based on an inventive step. On the other hand, The absence of any reference in the prior art which expressly addresses the technical problem solved by the claimed invention, is generally a strong indicator of inventive step.
Would you buy a beat up old used car at a new car price? Think about it. Would you look at this car that is all scratched up with dents and high miles on it, pay the full sticker price and think, “Wow, what a great deal!” No way. But that’s exactly what happens when you get into sex without being married. When you keep having sex and pushing further and further what you are actually doing is turning yourself into a used car. Then you are expecting someone to come along and make a full price commitment for a ragged out, used car.
“Umm…”
It’s a matter of perspective on how you view the film regardless of its obscenities and its taboo subject matter. But the mere fact that the performers and production team made a compelling, poignant epiphany in all of us! We can’t escape our demons but it’s never too late to ask for help and that’s why the story works, it’s straight up, all genuinely made coming from actual experiences not to be used for a mere excuse but rather on how we face it head on and not relying on happenstance, to be better than this carnal inhibitions through respect for others and especially for ourselves!
Cook a special meal with love for your partner or lovie love amiga - Feed each other, nourish each other - Write a spontanous text, Ps. I Love You - Make a music mix with song that may be connected to inside jokes or memories - Buy a voice recorder and record a special message for your partner (or write a little ole love note) - Make a secret pac, pinky swear with your partner that everyday you will do one or all of the following!
And the biggest news of all....I have some new business ventures!!
So, what's the deal? What kind of dumbass would allow such an obvious stealing of worth, tax value and the introduction of people that don't give a rodent's fanny about their neighborhood? How can you expect any positive outcome from displacing people that pay taxes and keep their homes well kept for those that wander the streets, deal drugs, steal at every chance and leave their 44 oz empties up and down the streets?
Sky dive
Poemhunter.com/Jerome-brooke
Its called Barretts.
But yeah, overall, I think it is coming together.
'Why,' I asked the head of a drapery business in London, 'do you drink your beer from a tankard?'
Achieving the well-being of rapport
- KIKO - Eye Base Primer: no pics, but a wonderful opinion for this products, it's perfect for my wrinkled eyelids, because it's creamy and fills very well imperfections. Also long lasting for my eyeshadows. Great, really.
Watch how the adorkable boys sing Beauty and the Beast, then cutie Yo Seob punching Doo Joon, and BEAST stating that male fans can be B2UTY’s as well.
Today I had a pleasant surprise when I went to a coffee shop I rarely frequent. The baristas make beautiful designs in their lattes! This is my mocha latte and it was as delicious as it was pretty.Oh yeah, the shop is aptly named Creations. They're located on Main Street in Wakefield if you are in the neighborhood.
Stop #2, Green Zebra.
And coaxed the foxes to the green,
‘Selfmachine’, ‘Quicker’ and finale ‘Caesar’ are punchy and massive crowd pleasers. Whether they’re lasting hits or big enough to bring Coco to the pop foreground is yet to be established… but we’ve decided we like her. She’s sticking it to the critics and capitalising on her own talent, rather than that of her fathers, with some really good music. Go Coco!
There are moments during our legislative sessions when it seems like trying to plea the people’s case just isn’t worth it…it almost feels like the Catholic influence a body has to wade through in the halls is waste high and thick as shit…but then there are moments like the Silenced Seven press conference, where those elected to represent Missourians actually struggle to do so, that make the work of citizen lobbyists seem worth it.
that three days ago I made a reasonable decision to short EUR against SGD (singapore dollar) and an excellent decision to go long on cable at the exact point it rallied, but sold out the cable trade with a very small profit whilst keeping the EURSGD short running. Unfortunately both rallied on the back of a bond sale/risk appetite increase and I was faced with the gutting sight of the GBP on a 1.5 cent rally whilst my short was closed out with a hefty loss.
well these cupcakes are for the
And he left her everything. But she seldom leaves home. She's never gotten over Daddy's death.
